Title
Review for Psycho (1998)
Number of Reviews
33

Author
Matt Williams
I'll admit it up front.  I've never considered the original Psycho to be
one of Hitchcock's best films.  Although a good film, it should be
celebrated more for its groundbreaking elements than for its quality.
That leads us to what has to be 1998's most unusual filmmaking attempt:
director Gus Van Sant's effort to create an exact shot-for-shot remake
of the original Psycho, but in color, and using an all new cast.
For those cave-dwelling hermits who are somehow unfamiliar with the
original film, here's a brief rundown.  Marion Crane (Anne Heche) is a
secretary at a small Phoenix real estate office.  One day, she's
presented with an opportunity too great to pass up.  She steals $400,000
in cash, and begins a desperate drive to meet her boyfriend, Sam Loomis
(Viggo Mortensen), who works outside of San Francisco.
However, she makes a wrong turn off the highway, and ends up at the
Bates Motel, run by the insecure Norman Bates (Vince Vaughn), and his
domineering invalid mother.
Meanwhile, the search is on for the missing Marion.   Her sister
(Julianne Moore) wants to make sure she's all right, and a private
investigator (William H. Macy) is out to recover the stolen money.  How
will it all end? Well, if you don't already know, I'm not going to spoil
it here.
This remake is not an exact shot-for-shot remake of the original.  A few
of the shots (such as the opening pan) have been made seamless, using
technology that wasn't around in 1960.  An additional shot which
Hitchcock originally wanted for the shower scene (but was forced to
abandon due to the censors) has been included.  Most of the other
additions are semi-subliminal.  There are occasional flashes of
unrelated imagery, as well as echoes and other "subliminal" sounds
placed on the soundtrack.  Unfortunately, the additions don't work. For
the most part, they're distracting...and certainly not an improvement.
But, on the whole, the film remains extremely similar to the original.
The sexuality and violence in the film has been peripherally heightened
(something which neither adds nor detracts from the film), and a few
lines of dialogue have been updated.  However, the film still seems to
be mired in the past.  Little things, like speech patterns or one
particular use of a telephone, which seemed appropriate in the original
now seem wildly dated.
But the good stuff has translated as well.  Many of the shocks and
surprises of the original are still shocking and surprising, provided
that you haven't been let in on the secrets. And that is perhaps the
film's biggest problem.  Knowing the secrets tremendously diminishes the
impact of the original Psycho, and the same certainly holds true here.
The quality of acting varies widely in the remake.  Some of the actors
(such as Rance Howard and Anne Heche) seem confined by the film's rigid
structure.  Others (such as Vince Vaughn and Julianne Moore) manage to
deliver different interpretations of the familiar characters, even
without additional dialogue or scenes.
On the whole, the remake is just about, but not quite as good as the
original Psycho.  However, with the original still out there, it is very
difficult to recommend seeing the remake instead.  In fact, it is
difficult to recommend the remake to anyone but perhaps a film student
or a devoted fan of all things Psycho.
- Matt Williams (matt@cinematter.com)
Reviewer for Cinematter: http://www.cinematter.com
Home of over 650 reviews, and information on nearly 700 upcoming
releases

Author
Mark O'Hara
A Film Review by Mark O'Hara
visit Online Film Critics Society at http://www.ofcs.org
Why remake "Psycho," the grand-daddy of thrillers?  Alfred Hitchcock did 
it so well 38 and a half years ago.  The script by Joseph Stefano (from 
Robert Bloch's novel) was a classic, the music and even the credits were 
works of art, and the direction was artistic.
The most compelling reason I can think of is to reach modern audiences.  
I am reminded weekly that young people are turned off by black and white 
films.  Their very mention rankles the students in my high school film 
literature classes.  I might as well threaten to show art films with 
subtitles.  Or some of the filmstrips still stowed away in our library's 
cabinets, titles from 38 years ago like "Weaning Pigs" or "Why Go To the 
Moon?"  Or play an audio tape narrated by a dead British actor.
So director Gus Van Sant has given youth a chance.  They will see for 
the first time Hitchcock's captivating vision of pure film - even if 
it's done by an American nearly half a century later.  They will  see 
clever techniques worked seamlessly into a smart narrative.  Several 
kids, I'm sure, will rent or borrow copies of the source on videotape.  
Even if they have seen the original, they will witness subtle updates 
and intricate spins that will knock around in their memories for awhile.  
We showed Hitchcock's "Psycho" this past semester, and many students did 
not grumble, but realized its importance as a groundbreaking work.  
These students have all the more reason to see this recreation.  So Van 
Sant's homage will mean that the original film and its director will 
live even longer in our personal filmgoing histories.
Another reason for a remake is the acting (and a few of the preachier 
scenes) of the original.  Let's face it - Hitchcock's cast smacks of 
stiffness today, with no puns intended.  Granted, perhaps it was stylish 
to be wooden, just as it is stylish today to wear tacky polyester 
jackets and pseudo-70's rayon blouses.  (Can you tell I don't give much 
credit to the costumers of this latest incarnation?  I know they meant 
the wardrobes to be throwbacks to the kitsch of postwar America, as well 
as echoes of angst-filled grunge, but c'mon!)  Many of the performances 
of the new "Psycho" seem more natural and casual than their forebears.  
I think Anthony Perkins and Martin Balsam, that character actor's 
character actor, were among the highlights of the oldie.  This new one 
has stalwart performances from almost everyone.
Vince Vaughn plays Norman Bates, the mama's-boy-gone-way-wrong.  Norman 
runs a small motel made obsolete by the superhighway that bypasses it.  
He lives in an imposing house up the hill from the cabins, a house also 
apparently occupied by his mother.  When a lone young woman - Marion 
Crane, played by Anne Heche - stops to get out of a rainy night, 
Norman's psychosis kicks in, and Marion is the victim of a terrible 
punishment.  (For what is she being punished?  Stealing the $400,000?  
Sleeping with Sam Loomis without being his wife?  The latter would seem 
absurd in terms of 1990's values.)  When Marion's sister Lila fails to 
locate Marion, she panics and leaves Phoenix for California, where Sam 
lives.  There's also a private detective involved, one Milton Arbogast 
(the ubiquitous William H. Macy).  The bulk of the plot traces the 
attempts of this trio in locating Marion, ostensibly at the last place 
she was seen - the Bates' place.
In his reprise of the Bates role, Vaughn is more menacing than Anthony 
Perkins.  Vaughn wears shorter hair and longer sideburns, and 
occasionally glowers like a leering devil.  His performance is strong, 
but considering Perkins' ownership of the role, a comparison would 
benefit no one.  Vaughn is good with the nervous candy-eating habit, but 
weak with the awkward chuckle.  Heche's version of Marion Crane is very 
expressive.  Her face reacts variously:  she's a cold customer at first, 
but in Norman's "parlor" she is compassionate, smiling, horrified.  
Julianne Moore is fitting as the equally cold sister.  In a brief comic 
relief bit, she shakes off Sam Loomis' arm as they enter one of Norman's 
cabins.  No matter who plays the Cranes, the script virtually 
predetermines our lack of concern for them.  Viggo Mortensen, as Sam 
Loomis, continues the slovenly hipness established by the wardrobe and 
sets;  perhaps our  distance from him, Marion and Lila shifts our 
sympathy from the ruination of their lives to the oddly compelling 
predicaments of Norman Bates.
Now for what Van Sant saw fit to change.  This is his "re-creation" of 
"Psycho," so he shot the same number of scenes on each day of the same 
six-week period used by Hitchcock.  The dialogue is mostly intact, and 
the music and cinematography have been only slightly tweaked.  What I 
liked includes some of the striking shots in the stabbing scenes.  
Again, the shower scenes should not even be compared.  For its time, 
Hitchcock's was unique and shocking; for any time, it was superior.  And 
I don't think Van Sant was out to one-up the master.  But this new 
showering does catch and sustain attention.  Particularly impressive is 
an extreme close-up in which Marion's pupil dilates as she is dying.  
Characters in this film also seem to have flitting hallucinations as the 
life force leaves them.  There are infrequent updates, as when Lila 
says, "Let me get my Walkman."  We witness at least one distasteful 
scene with Norman peeping at Marion - though I wonder if "Hitch" 
wouldn't have included it himself, had the censors and the country's 
milieu permitted.  A final nice touch is mysterious murmuring inside the 
house of Bates, a little aural stimulation that might make himself 
chuckle politely.  Applause to Van Sant for retaining the set 
decoration, especially in the parlor, where Marion, positioned beside 
the rounded shapes of a lamp and a pitcher, is surrounded by the beaks 
and talons of Norman's stuffed birds, not to mention the sharp triangle 
of the sandwich half she never eats.
One scene that could not be improved upon - because it was blatant and 
talky to begin with - is the explanation of Norman's illness.  It's 
delivered by Robert Forster instead of Simon Oakland, but it still rings 
false.  At least Van Sant edited out the ineffectual line, "He's a 
transvestite."
A good purpose "Psycho" could serve would be interesting young people in 
its predecessor.  After watching both, viewers could think critically 
for themselves.  And as long as they don't give lame reasons like, "It 
was better because it was in color," I  wouldn't blame them for liking 
either one.  
One question I have wasn't answered because the movie was not released 
for critics to pre-screen:  outside the real estate office, is that 
Hitchcock in a final, computer-generated cameo?


Author
Jeffrey Huston
Directed by Gus Van Sant.  Produced by Brian Grazer and Gus Van Sant.
Screenplay by Joseph Stefano.  Distributed by Universal Pictures.  Running
time:  109 minutes.  Release date:  December 4, 1998.
(to view this review complete with images from the film, go to:
http://www.impactprod.org/people/huston/psycho.htm )
Ever since Universal Pictures announced that they and director Gus Van Sant
("Good Will Hunting") would be `recreating' the Alfred Hitchcock masterpiece
"Psycho", the most oft asked question has been a simple three letter word:
why?  Well, given that it has been asked so much, it seems almost futile at
this point to ask it again.  It's done, it's in theaters, and that's
that-deal with it.
Besides, to ask `why?' to such an issue is as pointless as asking, `Why is
there pain and suffering?' or `Why do NBA players feel they need more
 money?' or even `Why is sleeping with an intern young enough to be your
daughter so easily forgiven nowadays?'  There are no reasonable answers to
these questions.  These realities exist, no matter how ludicrous they may
be, and that's the end of it.  We just need to accept it and move on.
So with that open frame of mind, I went to see the new "Psycho".  And as I
left the theater upon the film's conclusion, only one thought continued to
haunt my mind: why?  I know, I know, it's pointless to even ask.  But for
one who knows the greatness of the original (as so many of us do), I simply
couldn't stop myself from asking it.  In the context of having seen the
original, to see the new one simply warrants asking the question `why?'.
Hitchcock's "Psycho" has earned the right to be elevated as one of cinema's
sacred cows.  To tamper with such greatness is to flirt with cinematic blasp
hemy.  It is only because of a few elements of original creativity that Van
Sant and the rest should be saved from eternal film damnation.
Universal's new "Psycho" has been touted as a `shot-for-shot recreation' of
the original.  And while it does stay about 95% faithful to the original
script, it is not a pure `shot-for-shot' remake.  This is evident in the
film's opening hotel room scene.  Van Sant utilizes more close-ups and
camera movement than Hitchcock did in this sequence.  This is not a gripe on
my part, but simply an observation.  Such liberties in shot selection are
taken throughout this film, but some are unavoidable given that many of the
sets and locations are not exact replicas of the original.
But having said that, the new "Psycho" does contain a bountiful number of
shots that are literal recreations.  It was interesting to see these and
think back to the originals.  The sad part is that I continually found
myself preferring the originals, thus making this new movie going experience
more of a letdown.  As intriguing as the idea of a recreation is, I think
the talented Van Sant should have just opted to do a remake and bring his
own style to the table (that is, if he really had to remake it to begin
with).
Joseph Stefano, the original screenwriter for Hitchcock's "Psycho", was
brought on board to make minor tweaks to his script in order to update the
story to the Nineties.  As a result a few changes were made, one example
being the money stolen by Marion Crane was increased from $40,000 to
$400,000.  Necessary alterations such as these occur from time to time, but
for the most part the story remains intact.  Other changes are also present,
but I tend to think that they were more Van Sant's doing than Stefano's.
For those of you who wish to discover those changes for yourself, I won't
detail them in this review.  But for the curious or indifferent, you can
find a list of those changes with a link provided in the review on my
website (the link to that list can be found in this same paragraph).  It
essentially lists the differences that I observed.  For a link to the review
itself, see the top of this page.
But what I will do here is discuss my take on the film's look as well as its
performances, and I'll begin with the latter.  I do a great deal of
comparing between the two versions and the remainder of this review is
rather lengthy as a result.  Normally I would not do this with your standard
remake.  But given the fact that this is supposed to be a recreation of a
masterpiece, I feel that such comparative analysis is warranted.
Needless to say, the actors in this film certainly had their work cut out
for them.  And while these talented performers do a fine job in their own
right, their characterizations simply pale in comparison to the originals.
I'll start right off the bat with Norman Bates.  Without even taking
characterization into account, Vince Vaughn ("The Lost World", "Swingers")
simply isn't right for this role in my opinion.  Physically, he's just too
big.  The thin, lanky build of Anthony Perkins personified the shy mamma's
boy personality of Norman Bates.  Vaughn is no mamma's boy.  His build and
height tower over the rest of the cast, making him appear stronger than he
should.  Perkins didn't look like a threatening guy, making Norman all the
more creepy.  With the intimidating Vaughn, you almost expect the guy to
haul off on some of these people.  His obvious talent aside, Vaughn was
simply miscast.
Okay, so he doesn't look the part-but can he act it?  Yeah, he did okay.  It
's a fine job of acting to be honest, but one that would have looked better
had it not Perkins's masterful performance to overshadow it.  Vaughn
definitely makes it real, but his Norman Bates is a little too obvious in
comparison to Perkins.  Perkins was meek and child-like.  He was friendly,
but shy.  Vaughn's Bates is too personable.  Also, Vaughn exposes Bates's
psychosis more than Perkins did.  With Perkins you sense that there may be
something odd or different, but it's probably only because his mother
emotionally suppressed him.  To see Vaughn's Bates is to think, `Um, there's
really something wrong with this guy.'  And in the `post shower clean-up'
scene, we really see the difference between the two.  The Vaughn Bates is
genuinely troubled as he cleans up the blood and disposes of the body.  But
the Perkins Bates has a rather disturbing, methodical approach to him.  This
calm, calculated persona is far more troubling and intriguing.  Again, let
me restate that Vaughn does a fine job here.  But the Anthony Perkins Bates,
one of cinema's all-time great performances, is in every regard superior.
The other character prone for extensive dissection is that of Marion Crane.
It is up to the immensely talented and strong actress Anne Heche to fill the
Oscar-nominated shoes of Janet Leigh.  As with Vaughn, Heche ("Return To
Paradise", "Six Days, Seven Nights") does a good job; but she doesn't live
up to the standard set by Leigh.  Heche has a strong, assertive personality
in her acting style.  She brings it to the role of Marion Crane, and I feel
it is to the detriment of the character.  There's almost a sense of a dry
sarcastic attitude with Heche.  Heche's Marion is too confident and
emotionally together to be a person who is having an affair or one who
impulsively steals money and hightails it out of town.  It seems out of
character for her to do these things.  From the very beginning, Leigh's
Marion had an unease and nervousness about her.  She seemed confused and
uncertain.  Heche does not.
This comes into play in two key areas, the first of which is Marion's drive
that eventually leads her to the Bates Motel.  It is during this drive that
Marion imagines what others will be saying about her once they've discovered
what she has done.  Janet Leigh's stark, unblinking eyes revealed a paranoid
heart and guilty conscious.  Her intense stare showed us a mind that was
racing.  The intensity is lost with Heche.  She merely appears to be
thinking these thoughts, but doesn't seem overly troubled by them.  There
was something mysterious about Leigh's Marion, we never quite understand or
know her.  Heche, in comparison, almost seems like an open book.
The other scene is her parlor conversation with Bates.  As Norman discusses
the traps that each of us live in, Leigh's Marion subtly showed increasing
guilt and nervousness about the situation she had gotten herself into.
Again, Heche doesn't quite achieve this.  We see her thinking, but the
emotional aspect isn't there with the same intensity.  As a result, it
almost seems surprising that Heche's Marion would make the decision to
return home in the morning.  She hasn't seemed troubled enough up to this
point, so why does she feel compelled to turn back?  Plot-wise, it's
unavoidable of course.  But there's not enough emotional subtext with Heche
to motivate the change.  The bottom line-Heche's interpretation is simply
too strong and confident.
I will give praise to Heche for one key addition that I thought was very
insightful.  In the ill-fated shower scene, Heche's Marion has a moment of
recognition before she is brutally murdered.  This recognition, I feel,
increases the level of psychological terror in the scene.  Kudos to Heche
for this small but masterful improvement.
Without going into as much depth, I do wish to address some of the other key
characters.  William H. Macy ("Fargo") plays Detective Arbogast, hired by
Marion's employer to track her down.  Macy brings his trademark naturalism
to the role, but like Vaughn, he seems physically miscast.  Martin Balssam's
Arbogast was a husky gumshoe.  And although his demeanor was calm and
unthreatening, his physical presence seemed to intimidate the weaker Norman.
The physical makeup of the actors is reversed here, with Vaughn being much
bigger in comparison to Macy.  Balssam's Arbogast almost seemed like a
threatening male figure to Norman, much like the man who formed a
relationship with Norman's mother.  This subtext is lost by default given
the drastic physical differences between Vaughn and Macy.  Aside from that,
Macy's characterization is right on.
Two of the film's biggest changes are the characterizations of Lila Crane
and Sam Loomis.  Lila Crane was strong in the first "Psycho", but she seemed
to defer to Sam at times.  Julianne Moore's ("Boogie Nights", "The Lost
World") Lila is much stronger here, leading Sam every step of the way.  It's
definitely a 90s interpretation, and given that it fits this film.  Moore's
Lila is very aggressive and assertive.  But my preference is the more
balanced performance by Vera Miles in the original.
Moore's stronger Lila is exemplified best in the film's climactic scene.
Straying from the norm, Van Sant's direction of this scene is drastically
different (and far less effective) than Hitchcock's.  As well as differences
in characterization, great liberties are taken with shot selection and
composition.  There is one shot from the Hitchcock version of this scene
that is imbedded in my mind.  No attempt is made to even come close to
duplicating it.  If Van Sant's goal is to duplicate the original, why does
he veer drastically from one of the film's most crucial scenes?
I greatly enjoyed Viggo Mortenson's ("A Perfect Murder", "Crimson Tide")
take on Sam Loomis, the married man that Marion is having an affair with.
Mortenson's Loomis is a laid back, easy going hick cowboy without much
backbone.  He's not weak, necessarily, but morally indifferent.  John Gavin'
s Loomis seemed to have too much moral character and strength to be a guy
who would cheat on his wife.  With Mortenson, Loomis is exactly the type of
amoral person who would be involved in such an affair.  Mortenson's Loomis
is one of the few examples of where I preferred this "Psycho" over the
original.
The other would be in the character of Dr. Richmond, the psychiatrist who
explains the psychotic motives involved in the killings.  If the original
film had a weakness, it was this scene.  Simon Oakland's psychiatrist was
interpreted completely wrong.  Instead of portraying a doctor who is
examining the delicate psychosis of a disturbed mind, Oakland played it like
an angry police detective or prosecutor detailing the crime.  Emotionally,
Oakland was way off.  I won't expose the identity of the actor who portrays
Dr. Richmond in this new version so that you may discover it for yourself.
But I will say that he delivered one of 1997's top performances.  Given my
immense respect for that performance, I was pleasantly surprised to see him
take on this role that I felt needed much improvement.  This actor delivers
as he takes the softer, more caring approach with Dr. Richmond.  If for no
other reason, Van Sant can possibly justify his recreation in that he
greatly improved this scene.
For all of the missteps and errors that I feel Van Sant made here, I must
credit him for two areas where he changed the original.  These two changes
were elements that Hitchcock wanted to include, but for technological and
cultural reasons was unable to do so.  The first is the opening shot.
Panning across the expanse of Phoenix, Arizona, Van Sant's lengthy take
moves from a wide view of the city and closes in on the window of Marion's
hotel room, traveling through it to reveal Marion and Sam on the bed.  The
shot is continuous and uninterrupted.  This is how Hitchcock wanted to do
it, but was unable to because of technical restrictions.  His slow zoom into
the hotel room was assembled by dissolves, linking the various shots used to
compose this opening sequence.
The other is in the death of Marion.  Originally, Hitchcock wanted to have
an overhead shot of the naked dead Marion draped over the side of the
bathtub, revealing her entire body.  Given that it was a shot of her
backside, Hitchcock believed it is something he could get away with.  The
censors said otherwise.  Van Sant restores that shot to his version,
tastefully lingering on it for only a moment.
The two best elements of this new "Psycho" are the art direction and costume
design.  Although set in 1998, the look of this world is wonderfully retro.
The set pieces favor the late 60s and early 70s, as do the costumes.  But
the colors are modernly pastel, instilling it with a contemporary feel.
Props and clothing have an air of thrift store quality that is fun and
uniquely original.  Credit Tom Foden's production design and Beatrix Aruna
Pasztor's costumes for giving this recreation its most original elements.
I also took great joy in two of the film's more faithful efforts.  First and
foremost is Danny Elfman's loyal re-recording of Bernard Herrmann's
masterful score.  I must admit, a smile came across my face as the film
opened and the theater was filled with Herrmann's eerie composition.  Fifty
percent of the film's impact is found in the music, one that is frightfully
full while only using string instruments.  This is one of the most
recognized and best film scores of all time.  Thankfully, Elfman keeps in
intact.
The other element is that of the mysterious highway patrol officer that
Marion runs into on her way to the Bates motel.  I nearly did a double take
when I saw him.  The guy is a virtual clone of the actor in the 1960
original.  It really captivated me to see this.  I can only imagine the
giddy glee expressed by Van Sant and producer Brian Grazer when they came
across this actor.  It was, perhaps, the film's best element of homage to
the original.
Arguably the worst aspect of this recreation is the use of color.  The black
and white photography was such an integral element in the overall mood and
effect of the original.  The dark shadows and lifeless gray's created a
palpable sense of foreboding evil.  It also allowed Perkins and Leigh to
remain subtle while bringing out the subtext so evident in their eyes.  The
color makes the visuals too busy and distracting.  The imagery doesn't
arrest you as it does in the original, therefore exposing some of the story'
s slow pacing.  The original's black and white images enrapture you as the
compensate for the plot's few tedious moments.
The bottom line may be this: as I watched the new "Psycho" (less than two
hours, just like the 1960 version) it actually seemed to drag.  It didn't
captivate me like the original did.  Conversely, I could watch Hitchcock's
version tomorrow and be completely drawn into it from beginning to end.  It
has a psychological power that is missed in Van Sant's recreation.  If you
do see this new version, my recommendation would be this: watch Hitchcock's
version first, even if you've seen it before.  But if you haven't, then
without question you should see it prior to watching the recreation.  Do not
taint your initial viewing of Hitchcock's masterpiece with this plodding
remake.  Then shortly thereafter, like say within the next day or so, go see
the new one.  I think the greatest enjoyment one could have with Van Sant's
version is to view it comparatively.  Sure, it will most certainly result in
some level of disappointment, but there is something uniquely entertaining
in watching the film from this context.
Finally, let me just say this.  Van Sant, Grazer, Vaughn, Heche and the rest
were in an admittedly no-win situation.  The collective gifts that this
immense talent pool brings would have been better spent on an original
collaboration.  But instead, they are wasted on this doomed venture of
trying to meet expectations that are simply impossible to achieve.  Given
that, I commend them for their courage in tackling this daunting effort.  I
don't doubt their bravery or love for Hitchcock, but it is their wisdom that
I question.
(if you would like to read other reviews by Jeffrey Huston, visit his film
review website "Believe Me" at:
http://www.impactprod.org/people/huston/core.htm )

Author
Joe Chamberlain
Starring Vince Vaughn; Anne Heche; Julianne Moore & Viggo Mortensen
So why remake a classic like Psycho? After seeing the new version I still
have no idea why a remake was necessary. The only reason that I can come up
with is that they wanted to reach a younger audience that wasn't likely to
watch the original Black & White version. So how does this virtual shot for
shot remake compare to the original? Not bad. But compared to current horror
films, Psycho is dated, even if it is in color. Let's face it, the original
Psycho is not real scary by today's standards. I have my doubts that the
shower scene that terrified audiences back in 1960 will even phase today's
more jaded moviegoers. The original Psycho is a classic, this new version
will most likely end up as nothing more than a footnote. This is not to say
that the new Psycho is a bad movie, it's just that considering the only
differences in the movie are the cast and the color, most people would be
better off going to their local video store and renting the original.
For the uninformed out there, the plot of Psycho goes something like this.
Marion Crane (Anne Heche) steals a large quantity of money from her employer
and skips town with it. After a long day of driving, she stops for the night
at a motel run by Norman Bates (Vince Vaughn) and his Mother. Marion checks
in and then never checks out again after a little mishap in the shower.
Marion's sister (Julianne Moore) and Marion's lover (Viggo Mortenson) and
among those that set out to try to find out what happened to Marion.
In terms of the performances, the entire cast of the remake do a good job. A
real credit to them considering they are repeating line for line the
original dialogue of the original cast. Of course the main focus is on the
character of Norman Bates. Vince Vaughn does a very good job as the shy
motel owner with the overbearing mother. It's not good enough to make you
forget why Anthony Perkin's performance made the original the classic that
it is today. Other standouts in the cast are William H. Macy as a detective
working to find Marion Crane and her stolen money. The biggest treat of all
is the inclusion of Robert Forster in the cast. His character shows up at
the end of the film, and while it isn't a big part, it does end the movie
with a nice touch.
In terms of the look of the film, director Gus Van Sant does a good job. Of
course it would be hard not to do a good job since he basically replicated
everything Alfred Hitchcock did 40 years ago. My only complaint was that
they changed the exterior of Norman Bate's house, for what seems like no
reason other than for the sake of change.
Is the remake as good as the original? Not really, but it does have the
virtue of being in color. This new Psycho is good for taking a stroll down
memory lane. I found myself remembering certain scenes from the original as
I was watching this new incarnation. If you hate Black & White movies, then
go see this new Psycho. If you are not concerned about the color, rent the
original. While this new Psycho is a fairly good movie, the best thing about
it is that it will bring a whole new audience to the original

Author
Jeff Ignatius
Review by Jeff Ignatius (jsign@soltec.net)
In his story "Pierre Menard, Author of the Quixote," Jorge Luis Borges
envisions Don Quixote rewritten by his title character: "The Cervantes
text and the Menard text are verbally identical, but the second is
almost infinitely richer," Borges writes. Given Menard's background
and philosophies, he argues, the new Quixote is a markedly better work
than Cervantes'. That they are the same in every textual way is
irrelevant.
Fifty-odd years after Borges published his absurdist fiction -- which
both mocks the concept of remakes and raises legitimate, interesting
questions about the implications of authorship -- Gus Van Sant makes
the late Argentinian author something of a prophet with what's being
touted as a shot-for-shot recast of Hitchcock's 1960 classic Psycho,
with Van Sant having the balls to take the sole director's credit in
the opening titles.
While not exactly a Menardian under-taking -- his choice of color over
black-and-white, the need to use different actors, sets, props, and
cinematography make a film equivalent of "verbally identical"
impossible -- Van Sant's Psycho is largely his Quixote. He has taken
care to reproduce whenever possible Hitch's angles, shots, shooting
schedule, and techniques. The script has been updated slightly to fit
the 1990s (Menard would disapprove), and Bernard Herrmann's score was
tweaked by Danny Elfman, but it's certainly the most literal use of
the term "remake" ever to hit the screen.
The new movie is still the simple story of Marion Crane, a secretary
who steals some cash from her employer one Friday afternoon and leaves
town. Crane is, of course, the world's worst embezzler. As she strikes
out of Phoenix, she wears her guilt like makeup, attracting the
suspicion of a cop and a car salesman. On a rainy night, she finds
shelter at a backroad motel with 12 cabins, 12 vacancies, and Norman
Bates, the only person in the world whose nervousness threatens to
eclipse Marion's. Norman has reason to be uptight, though. His
domineering but oddly quiet mother is stashed in the house behind the
motel.
The movie still kills off its most developed character within 50
minutes, cruelly spoiling her shower. It still celebrates the odd bond
between a son and his mother. It's pretty much the Psycho you
remember.
Those who argue that such a by-the-storyboard remake is a priori a
waste of money and time (both the studio's and the audience's) fall
back on conventional wisdom that seems to apply only to film among the
arts. Regularly in recording studios and on theatre and concert
stages, acclaimed directors, actors, musicians, and conductors perform
works that have been given their "definitive" treatments years,
decades, or even centuries before. Nobody complains, because nuances,
shades of meaning, and even wholly new interpretations can spring from
strictly-adhered-to texts.
I approached the new Psycho hoping that Van Sant had found something
new and different in the script and story. But he hasn't, and it's a
shame. The execution is solid, but I so wanted something more, new,
and different.
Anne Heche is Marion Crane and Vince Vaughn is Norman Bates in Van
Sant's version, and they try to take different angles on their
characters. Yes, they're somewhat fresh, but the self-aware
performances only make the characters less interesting. More
importantly, they relate to each other exactly as in Hitchcock's
original.
The movie's first mistake is its conception of Marion. Heche plays her
as a ditzy sprite who steals $400,000 seemingly on a lark, not even
considering the consequences until she's on the road. Janet Leigh's
oppressed, worn Marion anchored the first half of Hitchcock's movie
and gave the impression of a person burdened by a lot more than just
some pilfered bills. In Psycho's twisted idea of justice, we should be
punished harshly for our sins, however menial: Janet Leigh had an
unpleasant stay at the Bates Motel for a lifetime of bad choices, but
Heche gets the knife for being stupid.
Vaughn's turn is better than Heche's but still problematic. Anthony
Perkins played Norman with a stutter and awkward pauses, while Vaughn
is all fidgets and munching, ripping through his lines. Through most
of the movie, Vaughn's performance is convincing, but he hits the
wrong notes frequently enough -- his grin is more giddy than evasive
-- to undermine the character, and remind us how well Perkins played
the role. His confident, hulking mass (especially compared to the
slight Heche) is also distracting; Norman requires somebody with a
physical meekness.
Heche and Vaughn should be given credit, of course, for even trying to
recreate their characters after the pitch-perfect performances of
Leigh and Perkins, so cheers Anne and Vince. Do better next time.
The more seasoned actors offer some guidance, suggesting that redoing
Psycho well was not impossible. Julianne Moore brings a fierce
determination to the role of Marion's sister -- bent on finding what
happened to her sibling -- while William H. Macy is spectacular in the
small role of the private detective hired to discover the truth. Viggo
Mortensen is often unintelligible as Marion's boyfriend (shades of
Fenster in The Usual Suspects), but at least he has some fun, taking
his pretend union with Moore a bit too far for a grieving lover.
In some ways, though, discussing how Van Sant's Psycho works or fails
within Hitchcock's structure is irrelevant. However faithful Mr.
Drugstore Cowboy is to The Master's direction, he takes many other
liberties, usually for the worse. Van Sant treats the original script,
storyboards, music, and architecture largely as sacred texts, but
apparently felt no need to be true to any other part of the movie.
With just a few added sounds, in fact, the director subtracts from the
original. Hearing Norman Bates unbuckle his belt and masturbate as he
watches Marion Crane undress imposes a purely sexual reading that, in
the original, was simply one of many reasonable interpretations.
A more fundamental change, of course, is the choice of color
cinematography. Van Sant's palette and photography are usually
provocative and sometimes stunning, especially in the virtually
incandescent bathroom, glowing with surgical whiteness. But the color
Psycho dulls the sharp black-and-white compositions of the original,
which were so integral to the story's simple, extreme take on crime
and punishment.
I can understand Van Sant's decision, though, and maybe even agree
with it. His choices in costume design, on the other hand, defy
explanation. The entire cast wears some of the most hideous outfits
ever seen, and dying would be a welcome escape from gaudy clothes.
Every costume change is an occasion for laughs, and that's not a good
thing for a movie that needs to build tension and anxiety to succeed.
And, let's be honest, Van Sant cheats on the direction, too, tinkering
in some very minor ways. "Shot-for-shot" is a lie.
The shower scene, for instance, delivers on the director's promise to
make it more explicit in violence and nudity; this might well be, to
cite one example, the first mainstream movie with an anus shot. But
the effect is minimal.
Some of Van Sant's directorial changes actually enhance the picture.
The climactic attack in which Norman is unwigged is newly
choreographed and directed, making it less awkward and more exciting.
Whether they work or not, though, any change in Hitchcock's shot
selection destroys the idea behind the movie. If you're not going to
be 100-percent true to the original storyboards, what difference does
it make if you're 90-, 80-, or 70-percent faithful?
The two murder scenes of Psycho illustrate Van Sant's willingness to
add to Hitchcock's vision with contemporary film techniques. Gus takes
a page from Natural Born Killers by using quick cuts to unrelated
footage in the slashing sequences. Marion's shower scene flashes to
ominous, rolling clouds, while the detective's last moments offer a
brief glimpse of an animal.
These moments show how Van Sant might have brought Psycho to a
contemporary audience. Video, age, and reputation have already
corrupted the original, after all. A 1960 audience had no idea that
the person who appeared to be the main character would be killed off
within 50 minutes, no warning for the brutality of that death, and
probably no clue that Mother had been dead for a decade and her son
was a cross-dresser, among the least of his faults.
That's all part of the cultural conscious now. Nobody goes in blind.
As a result, Van Sant's Psycho is uniquely tame and quaint for a
contemporary horror film. The changes are so minor -- and generally so
insignificant -- that the casual viewer won't notice them at all. The
director doesn't up the ante by truly bringing the story to the
present, into a culture where violence, nudity, theft, transvestites,
voyeurism, and unhealthy mother-son relationships can be found on
dozens of television shows daily. If Van Sant wanted to truly
replicate the experience of Psycho, he would have tried to upset us,
not take us back to yesteryear.
By rewriting the story and acknowledging contemporary tolerances,
expectations, film techniques, and our familiarity with Psycho, Van
Sant could have done something special with the movie. By using, say,
70 percent of Hitchcock's shots. dialogue, and plot, and turning up
the intensity, he could have delivered a reverent reinterpretation
while trying to make moviegoers squirm, even in an age of Scream.
Van Sant chose the easy way out. In many ways, he has made a movie in
which the director is virtually blameless for anything that's wrong.
Don't like the direction? You're slandering a dead man. Don't like the
script? Not Van Sant's fault. Don't like the performances? The actors
take the fall.
Make no mistake, the new Psycho still works. There's also the fun of
searching for the differences, of comparing the performances, of
seeing Hitchcock's vision in vibrant colors and garish outfits.
But if Van Sant can't shoulder any blame, nor does he get any credit;
Joseph Stefano's script and Hitchcock's direction are still the forces
behind Psycho. As a result, Van Sant's product is empty and pretty
much pointless. It's fundamentally Psycho, and it's fundamentally
sound.
But it's also fundamentally a cop-out.
*This review was originally published in The Octopus, the alternative
weekly newspaper of Champaign-Urbana, Illinois, and can be found with
dozens of other movie reviews on the Flush Web site:

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed Gus Van Sant.
Cast: Vince Vaughn, Anne Heche, Viggo Mortensen, Julianne Moore, William 
H. Macy, Chad Everett, Rance Howard, Robert Forster, Philip Baker Hall, 
Rita Wilson, James LeGros, Anne Haney.
1998 - 108 minutes.
Rated R (for violence, partial nudity, sexual situations, and blood).
Reviewed December 5, 1998.
By Dustin Putman 
Dustin Putman's Film Reviews ">Http://members.aol.com/filmfan16/index.html>
Ever since a "recreation" of Alfred Hitchcock's infamous 1960 classic, 
"Psycho," was announced earlier this year, many fans of the original 
yelled blasphemy and were outraged that anyone would attempt a remake. 
But, of course, this wasn't just any remake, because acclaimed director 
Gus Van Sant firmly stated that the new version would rigidly follow the 
original's screenplay, although it would be set in 1998, and that his 
purpose was to freshly introduce a classic to a new generation. Up until 
its release, rumors flew by, questioning what the differences would be 
in this 1998 version. And in keeping with its predecessor, Van Sant 
didn't even screen it for critics in advance, just as Hitchcock didn't 
38 years ago.
Ultimately, there is one question in all "Psycho" fans' minds: Is this 
film better than the original? The answer is no, not quite, but to my 
shock, it is just about as good of a remake as could have possibly been 
expected. 
For a full synopsis of the storyline, my review for Psycho (1960) is 
recommended, but simply to recount the plot, a young banker by the name 
of Marion Crane (Anne Heche) steals $400,000 (it was $40,000 in the 
original) and while on the run, picks the wrong motel to spend the night 
in, headed by the boyish young man, Norman Bates (Vince Vaughn).
"Psycho '98," which I will refer to this film as for the rest of my 
review to avoid confusion, surely does follow Joseph Stefano's original 
screenplay, and is a bold experiment on Van Sant's part. No film has 
ever been remade shot-by-shot, but, for the most part, "Psycho '98," is. 
And since the original was such a masterpiece, the things an audience 
must go on this time around are the elements surrounding the script, 
such as the technical credits, acting, style, etc. Luckily, "Psycho 
'98," is a startling success, a film that is impressive in almost every 
department.
Van Sant has assembled a great line of actors in this film, and although 
the tempting thing to do would have been to mimic the original actors, 
they all smartly choose to add their own interpretation and spin to the 
characters, and thus, we actually do grow different feeling for the 
people than in the 1960 version. Anthony Perkins has been such a staple 
of, "Psycho," that no one could ever replace him as Norman Bates, but 
Vince Vaughn must be applauded for going in a totally different 
direction with the character, and dare I say, nearly equalling Perkins. 
Vaughn's Norman has the ability to be threatening, but I also felt far 
more sympathy for him in this film. Anne Heche is also very good as 
Marion Crane, and although Janet Leigh might have been a little better, 
Heche was more likable. Julianne Moore, as Marion's sister, Lila, 
replaces Vera Miles and is interesting because she is so much more 90's. 
She is even introduced wearing a walkman. Viggo Mortensen, as Marion's 
boyfriend, taking over for John Gavin, also does a full 180 degree turn 
on the character, giving him a cowboy attitude. Rounding out the five 
central characters is William H. Macy, outstanding as Detective 
Arbogast, actually improving upon Martin Balsam's portrayal (although he 
was fabulous, as well).
There are lots of nice, eerie touches throughout that add to the film. 
For example, the shower scene, far more graphic this time around, is 
actually more suspenseful than in the original. The set-up wisely goes 
on longer, as we see the door open and a figure walk into the bathroom, 
as we see through the shower curtain. Unlike the original, where the 
murder happens abruptly, the figure pauses for a few moments through the 
shower curtain, before...well, you know. The actual murder set-piece 
also puts a new spin on things, and is harrowing, to say the least. The 
other murder sequence, set on the staircase, is also extremely 
effective. As Arbogast is stabbed, there are quick flashes of disturbing 
images, such as a cow in the middle of a desolate road about to be hit 
by an automobile. This stylish decision, thanks to Van Sant, is 
atmospheric and ingenious. Finally, the climax set in the fruit cellar 
surpassed all of my possible expectations, and the unveiling of Norman's 
mother really was frightening. 
There are things that occur in, "Psycho '98," that Hitchcock could not 
have possibly done in 1960, because of the censors, but that add to the 
Norman Bates character. For example, while Norman peers through a hole 
in the wall at Marion undressing, he begins to masturbate, and it was 
actually touching. I couldn't believe how moving it was. Also, in the 
climax, while Lila is looking through the house, she goes into Norman's 
room, which resembles a twisted children's bedroom, equipped with toy 
soldiers, stuffed animals, and a porno magazine hidden in a drawer. It 
was subtle elements like this that made me start to care for Norman 
Bates, who is obviously a very confused, lonely man. 
Major kudos, aside from the performances, must go to the alternately 
beautiful and moody production design by Tom Foden, the disturbing, 
original cinematography by Chris Doyle, and, of course, the 
incomparable, pounding music score by Bernard Herrmann, which was 
flawlessly adapted by Danny Elfman.
So with all of this praise, why isn't "Psycho '98," quite as good as the 
original? Well, the Lila character wasn't quite as memorable as when 
Vera Miles did the role, although this is no fault of Moore's. And the 
black & white photography of Hitchcock's could never possibly be 
replaced by color. 
Although this new, "Psycho," is, in my mind, the best horror film of the 
year, I have a feeling that most people unfamiliar with the original 
will not like it very much. I have no doubt in my mind that some 
dimwitted teenagers are going to go into this thinking it will be a 
"Scream"-style slasher film, and they will be sorely disappointed. 
Although those types of movies have a rightful place in the horror 
genre, "Psycho," is better, because it is not all about killing (there's 
only two murders in the film), but instead is about the style and 
characters. Watching this film, I was struck by the extended dialogue 
scenes between some of the characters, which are so much more developed 
than most films of today's times. Director Gus Van Sant took a risky 
chance in remaking what is considered one of the greatest horror 
pictures ever made, and he has succeeded in all departments, actually 
improving upon the original in a few select aspects. Nothing will ever 
be able to take the place of Hitchcock, that is for sure, but I was 
amazed and awestruck at just how close Van Sant actually came to doing 
just that.

Author
Craig Roush
Release Date: December 4, 1998
Starring: Vince Vaughn, Julianne Moore, Viggo Mortensen, William H.
Macy, Philip Baker Hall, Anne Heche, Robert Forster
Directed by: Gus Van Sant
Distributed by: Universal Pictures
MPAA Rating: R (violence, sexuality/nudity) 
URL: http://www.execpc.com/~kinnopio/reviews/1998/psycho.htm
The original PSYCHO, released in 1960 and directed by Alfred Hitchcock,
is a classic suspense thriller which all other entries of the genre
derive their lineage from. Even for one who's never seen the movie --
such as myself -- the movie's popularity among film buffs is immediately
popular. Only the first syllable of Hitchcock's last name need be
invoked before testamonies come pouring from the lips of others. And,
being a classic, aging only makes it more popular; so, it's natural,
then, that someone might want to remake it? 
The arts are filled with remakes. For the theater, the most popular
remake vehicle is probably THE NUTCRACKER or LES MISRABLES; for the
cinema, LES MIS again comes to mind. While it's almost a given that a
remake will never approach the genius of the original, filmmakers take
their shot either for fame or for love of film. Hopefully it's the
latter -- someone who just wants to work with a great script -- but
likelihood says it's the later -- someone wants to be known as the
genius who bested a longstanding champion. It's difficult to say where
Gus Van Sant stands in helming his PSYCHO remake. 
The bottom line on Van Sant's product is that it falls flat on its face.
There's no question that the script was written as a truly cinematic
experience; do not mistake this to be a cleverly-penned movie. Instead,
Joseph Stefano gives the filmmaker a bare bones plot and expects that it
will be glorified by atmosphere -- camera angles, moody music, timing or
pacing, film speed or stock, acting, and any of the other qualitative
properties of a movie. This may have been the case in 1960 with Alfred
Hitchcock, Anthony Perkins, and Janet Leigh, but it is most certainly
*not* the case in 1998 with Gus Van Sant, Vince Vaughn, and Anne Heche. 
The movie begins as we're introduced to Marion Crane (Heche) and her
lover, Sam Loomis (Viggo Mortensen). Loomis is deep in debt but working
it off so that he can get out of his marriage and live happily with
Marion. Until that happens, however, Marion is set working at a real
estate company. Upon returning from a "late lunch" with Sam, Marion
finds her boss about to sell a house worth $400,000 to a wealthy
Arizonan; the rich shmuck pays entirely in cash and the greens are
handed over to Marion to take to the bank. She immediately thinks of the
possibilities of paying off her lover's debts, and takes to the road in
a newly purchased car -- her only mistake in stopping at the Bates motel
along the way. 
The motel is run by an eerie fellow named Norman Bates (Vaughn) and is
entirely vacant when Marion shows up. She disappears shortly thereafter,
and soon Marion's sister Lila (Julianne Moore), a p.i. (William Macy),
and Sam come looking for her. The movie ought to reach its peak here,
but there is absolutely no tension or suspense developed and PSYCHO
becomes rather boring. Van Sant looks for cheap thrills by using camera
tricks, but comes up empty-handed. This isn't the sort of work you'd
expect from an Oscar-nominated director, and certainly isn't
recommendable either. Best to see it at cheap prices; or rent the
original, because by any measuring stick, it's a better watch.

Author
Scott Renshaw
     I'll admit that I didn't rent the original PSYCHO last night so I
could make my shot-by-shot comparison with a fresh memory.  I'm fairly
certain Hitchcock didn't make it explicit that Master Bates was
masturbating while watching Marion Crane disrobe, the opening helicopter
shot was definitely new, and I can't recall near-subliminal shots of
gathering storm clouds edited into the legendary "shower scene."
Otherwise, everything appeared pretty consistent with my recollection.
Director Gus Van Sant -- for reasons he has given anywhere from "why not
remake a good film instead of a bad film?" to just plain "why not?" -- had
indeed taken one of American cinema's most iconic horror films, dipped it
in color, and served it up whole to a new generation of movie-goers.
     The metronomic repetition of "why" is a bit futile at this point, but
I'm willing to hazard my own guess as to the answer:  Van Sant wanted to
remind viewers what a brilliant director Alfred Hitchcock was, and what a 
brilliant example of direction PSYCHO was in particular.  I hope viewers
(and critics) don't fold their arms in indignation so tightly against
their chests that they fail to recognize how incredibly suspenseful and
tautly paced the first hour of this PSYCHO is.  Beginning with the most
famous red herring in film history -- the theft of $400,000 from a real
estate office -- the story follows Marion Crane (Anne Heche) from Phoenix
to California, where she makes an ill-fated stop at the Bates Motel.
There she meets manager Norman Bates (Vince Vaughn), whose heart belongs
to Mommy and whose cutlery has a way of finding itself imbedded in flesh.
     Heretical though it may seem to say so, the first half of this
PSYCHO is better than the original, because Heche's interpretation of
Marion is better than Janet Leigh's.  Her steadily mounting guilt and fear
of discovery as she tries to bring the loot to her bankrupt boyfriend Sam
(Viggo Mortensen) are palpable.  The staging -- Hitch's ominous angles,
Bernard Herrmann's chilling score -- masterfully builds the tension, but
it also allows us watch Heche's mind work, and she's as fiercely
intelligent an actress as we have today.  While the narrative is focused
on Marion's flight, it really flies.
     Eventually, of course, Marion exits the film wrapped in a shower
curtain, which leaves us with Norman and the snooping of Sam, Marion's
concerned sister Lila (Julianne Moore) and private detective Arbogast
(William H. Macy).  It also leaves us with the PSYCHO's one huge problem:
Vince Vaughn as Norman Bates.  There's nothing exactly wrong with Vaughn's
performance, which is edgy and scary.  Vaughn simply can't help the fact
that physically, he is completely wrong for the role.  Towering over every
other actor in the piece, his good looks untamed by a bad haircut, Vaughn
is far too physically intimidating to play the meek, sexually repressed
basket case.  He throws the entire second half of the film out of whack,
leaving the audience with nothing to do but watch Van Sant and his cast
play out the rest of the film.
     There are any number of reasons why a PSYCHO nearly 40 years removed
from the well-known original can't work quite as well.  The shower scene
is now a film-school standby as minutely dissected as the Zapruder film,
not a viscerally shocking surprise; familiarity with the true nature of
Norman's "mother" makes some of his dialogue unintentionally humorous.
But there's no question that it does still work as an example of building
terror through film-making skill.  It also shows that the success of
particular choices may be built around the casting.  The best choice with
Anthony Perkins as Norman does not equal the best choice with Vince Vaughn
as Norman -- it's chaos theory at its finest applied to the art of
directing.  Gus Van Sant has honored the master (closing the film with a
dedication to Hitchcock), but he hasn't duplicated him.  This incarnation
of PSYCHO isn't a forgery of a great work of art.  It's more like a photo
of a great work in an art history textbook -- a bit flat, but intriguing
enough to make you want to get a better look at the real thing.

Author
Seth Bookey
Seen on 5 December 1998 by myself at the Cineplex First Ave and 62nd
Street for $8.75
Earlier this year Roger Ebert declared that the one movie that did not
need to be remade was Alfred Hitchcock's *Psycho*. So of course they went
out and remade it
The ad campaign was very slick, leading you to believe that you might be
seeing something something new and different. Well, with very few
exceptions, you are seeing director Gus Van Sant refilm the Hitchcock
classic shot-for-shot, with all the same dialogue, and even Bernard
Herrmann's original score.
Now mind you, I am a bit of an expert on this film. It was my term paper
for my Hitchcock class at college, and I saw the movie four times in one
week while studying the shot-by-shot analysis in a book--appropriately
entitled *Psycho*.
So it was actually disappointing to see nothing new. The few additions
made by van Sant are distracting at best--like the cutaways to fuzzy video
images during Crane's and Arbogast's murders. Why? It simply ruins the two
best scenes in the movie.
While refilming the movie shot-for-shot "brings it to a new audience"--and
in color--it becomes dated. Elements from the original that placed it in
1960, like detectives wearing hats, having the operator "put the call
through" and a motel that suffers because "they moved the highway" are
misplaced here. Meanwhile, references to her Walkman make Lila Crane
(Julianne Moore) a commercial for Sony.
Oh, and adding slapping noises as a Norman masturbates while peeping at a
disrobing Marion is completely unnecessary. Subtlety, Gus, subtlety,
please. Hitchcock's audiences knew how to fill in the blanks quite nicely
on their own. Contrasted to the dullness of telling the story
moment-for-moment as the original, the audience's derisive laughter is
well deserved.
Because the new version is in color, there is some room for new movement,
but the only option played is to give Marion (Anne Heche) an orange motif.
The reasons for this are not clear, or necessary.
While younger audiences (late teens/early twenties) might never have seen
the original, it's hard to see how it can stand up to the far more
sophisticated thrillers they surely have come expect, like *Scream*. In
it's day, killing off the star in the first third of the film and leaving
the rest of the cast to play out a new storyline (embezzlement story turns
into a murder mystery of psychotic proportions) was new, innovative.
Today, the story seems quite boring, and Viggo Mortensen (as Marion's
lover Sam) and Moore (as her sister) are the twin definitions of
uncompelling as they look into Marion's disappearance.
Only Vince Vaughn's crack at the Norman Bates role made famous by Anthony
Perkins keeps the story moving. He is much taller than Heche, and more
menacing than Perkins.
In the end, the most interesting performance is Heche's. The most
interesting part of *Psycho* (here and in the original) is the unsung
first reel in which Marion has decided to make off with her boss's cash,
and is imagining the hot pursuit she must be fleeing. In both movies, the
cop with the sunglasses is possibly the *most* menacing figure,
practically rivaling "Mother" (whose rants were better in the original).
Chad Everett is hilarious as the lecherous Texan businessman.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Author
Bill Chambers
Were Alfred Hitchcock alive today, he probably wouldn't give half the
damn that Psycho 1998's detractors do-I'll bet that he would simply wish
Van Sant "good luck" and turn the other cheek. In fact, the new film is
unlikely to continue to drum up controversy; my guess is that within
weeks it will have all but vanished from cinemas and moviegoers' memory
banks, mostly because Van Sant has given a sixties movie a modern spin,
yet succeeded in taking the edge off the original.
Must I recount the tale of Norman Bates and his mum? Phoenix, Arizona
receptionist Marion Crane (Heche) steals a bunch of money ($400 000 this
time around) from her real estate company, with the intention of running
off with her lover, Sam Loomis (Mortensen). She stops at the Bates Motel
for a good night's sleep along the way to California, where she shares
sandwiches, milk, and stitled conversation with the taxidermist owner,
Norman Bates (Vaughan), a mama's boy if there ever was one. Later,
Marion is murdered in the shower by Mrs. Bates; her body, her car, and
her personal belongings-including the loot-are disposed of in a nearby
swamp by fearful Norman. An investigation ensues: Detective Arbogast
(William H. Macy), and amateur sleuths Loomis and Lila (Moore), Marion's
sister, attempt to uncover the truth behind Marion's disappearance.
Van Sant's version is basically a recreation of the original, with the
exception of a few wrongheaded additions (do we really need those added
flashcuts of storm clouds and human atrocities during the murder
sequences?). What struck me most about Psycho 1998 was how the
replicated pacing-a perfect tempo for the original-seemed too damn
sluggish for today's viewers: audience members were dropping off to
sleep all around me. (Perhaps that does defend Van Sant's MTV-style
killings, after all.) Psycho's screenplay remains brilliant-the stolen
money having no ultimate significance to the story was of course
Hitchcock's greatest red herring, but Heche is not nearly the big star
Janet Leigh was in 1960: even virgins to the tale will not be fazed by
her demise halfway through the film, as she's just one member of a cast
of solid but not popular actors. The current shower scene lacks its
predecessor's sense of pulp, mischief and kink. (Aside: for whatever
reason, the psycho-babble epilogue is more palpable this time around.
Another aside: Danny Elfman's reorchestration of Bernard Hermann's score
sounds great in digital sound.)
How are the performances? Occasionally, the dated dialogue sounds a
little silly coming out of their mouths. (If Van Sant went so far as to
update Hitch's vision by shooting in colour, why not extensively revise
the script, too?) The most successful at reinventing his role is Macy as
Arbogast, whose previous work with David Mamet positively affects his
delivery-whenever Macy is on screen, it's impossible to turn your head.
Heche, Mortensen, and Moore are just fine, but they seem to be dying to
improvise and ad-lib. The movie is such a rigid remake it barely allows
them breathing space.
With only a few puckers of his bee-stung lips and the occasional
narrowing of his fashion model eyes, Vaughan comes off as much more
sinister (not to mention physically imposing) than Anthony Perkins'
Bates-ultimately, Vaughan fails to convince us his psychotic behaviour
isn't premeditated. An impish Van Sant can be glimpsed through the
window of the real estate office in scene two, and I couldn't help but
think he should've played the title character: he bares a resemblance to
Perkins and obviously has a deeper affinity for the material than
Vaughan.
Ultimately, what disappointed me most about this Psycho was its
softness. Why is Marion lolling around in bed with her naked lover
wearing a bra and panties? Why the use of such obvious visual metaphors
as storm clouds? Is this same director responsible for Drugstore Cowboy
and the envelope-pushing My Own Private Idaho? I can't help but think of
the moment in Psycho 1998 when Moore is startled by her own reflection
on a giant mirror. It's as if Van Sant was too busy looking at
Hitchcock's movie and too frightened to explore the truly personal
aspects of the yarn, rendering this recreation functional but pointless.

Author
Ryan Kohler
     Look!  The new version of "Psycho" came out and the world didn't end!  I
guess Gus Van Sant really ISN'T the bringer of the Apocalypse!
     Unfortunately, though, that "Psycho" didn't end the world as we know is
the best thing that can be said for it.
     Van Sant's controversial "re-telling" of Alfred Hitchcock's classic 1960
film has polarized filmgoers everywhere (even before it premiered.)  Without
benefit of an actual viewing, many have said that the film will, at best,
suck.  Being an (almost) good critic, I waited until I actually saw it to
decide that the film, at best, sucked (and that concludes the use of the word
"suck" and, hopefully, the thoughts that I am a brain-dead orangutan.)
     Director Gus Van Sant took the original Hitchcock film and refilmed it,
shot-for-shot, using the same, exact script (with a few minor alterations.)
The inherent challenge was in making the film suspenseful and scary, even
though a large group of the audience will know EXACTLY what will happen at the
EXACT time. 
     Suspense probably could have been attained if the actors had been able to
create something new or different than the original.  Sadly, that did not
occur.  It is hard to be overshadowed by Vera Miles and John Gavin (from the
original "Psycho), but that is what exactly happened to Julianne Moore and
Viggo Mortensen.  In Moore's case, the film would have been helped if "The X-
Files" Gillian Anderson had been cast instead; especially since Moore goes
through the entire film DOING a Scully impression!  From the cold demeanor and
expressions to her rigid way of forming a sentence, Moore IS Scully!
     Mortensen (who I liked in "G.I. Jane") opts to play Sam Loomis as a
cowboy/hick, which would have been nice if he had gone PAST that starting
point.  Sam has a twang and a cowboy hat, but that's about it.  Mortensen
turns in one of the most uptight performance in recent memory.
     Anne Heche, in the Janet Leigh role, does a few good things in her brief
time on screen.  At least her Marion Crane has a LITTLE life in her, which
can't be said for most of the rest of the cast.
     The best work, though, comes from Vince Vaughn, as the demented Mama's
boy, Norman Bates.  He's not going to make anyone forget Anthony Perkins, but
he is effective both in being naughty and nice.  The best part of the film is
the dinner scene Heche and Vaughn, where they simply talk.  There is some
solid acting there, something that is not carried through the rest of the
film.
     Van Sant has made a BORING film.  All the camera tricks that Hitchcock so
eloquently used in 1960 aren't as eye-catching now.  What passed for
brilliance then has been copied so many times by so many directors that they
don't impress or excite.  Van Sant, in what I assume is a grasp at
originality, decided to put some stream-of-consciousness images into a few
famous scenes (was that a lamb in the middle of the road?)  These images,
included with some questionable editing choices, took away from the scenes
themselves and caused, at first, bewilderment and, later, laughter.
Definitely NOT Hitchcock's intention!
     At least Danny Elfman had the good sense to not mess with Bernard
Herrmann's original famous and terrific score.
     If a film like "Psycho" does not frighten, then what's the point.  Aside
from Norman, the characters are thinly drawn people who leave no connection
with the audience.  There are things Van Sant and Company could have done to
at least make their recreation interesting.  In the end, however, the new
"Psycho" is a noble attempt, but, alas, a dismal failure.  

Author
Michael Dequina
Of all the talk leading up to the release of Gus Van Sant's update of
Alfred Hitchcock's _Psycho_, none was quite so intriguing as a rumor that
began circulating a few months ago.  This bit of gossip stated that instead
of being a complete shot-by-shot "recreation" as announced, the new film
would only be a duplicate until an hour in, at which point it would veer
into a completely original direction.  At about the one-hour point, there
arose a split-second moment where it looked like the rumor could be true:
motel keeper Norman Bates (Vince Vaughn) nearly opens a folded-up
newspaper.  (Anyone who has seen the original would know the significance.)
 Alas, he only _nearly_ opens it, and this _Psycho_ is exactly what Van
Sant promised (threatened?), a virtually shot-by-shot, line-for-line copy
of the seminal 1960 chiller.  And, as everyone knows, copies never come out
nearly as sharp as the original.
Ironically enough, the copy-then-diverge strategy probably would have been
more in line with Hitchcock's original sensibility; after all, his film was
a big bait-and-switch (or, rather, "Bates-and-switch").  What begins as a
yarn about a larcenous lady on the lam (Marion Crane, here played by Anne
Heche) suddenly switches gears midway through, shifting its focus to the
mysterious Bates, a hermit whose entire life centers around his invalid
mother.  When Marion and the money she stole from her employer disappears
without a trace, her lover Sam Loomis (here played by Viggo Mortensen) and
sister Lila's (here played by Julianne Moore) search leads them to the
nearly-deserted Bates Motel.
Everything in the new film plays exactly as it did in the film from nearly
40 years ago, with a few contemporary wrinkles thrown in by Van Sant and
Joseph Stephano, scripter of the original.  The $40,000 that Janet Leigh's
Marion stole has been upped to $400,000.  Vera Miles's prissy Lila has
become Moore's Walkman-wearing, ball-busting tough chick.  John Gavin's
pompously stuffy Sam has become Mortensen's roughneck cowboy.   Norman now
masturbates while spying on Marion in the bathroom.  And in a truly bizarre
move, Van Sant delves into Oliver Stone's bag of tricks, arbitrarily
slipping in subliminal shots of storm clouds and deer (among other things)
during the murder scenes.  (Also worth mentioning is a brief shot of a bus
stop Marion drives by--featuring a poster for _Six_Days,_Seven_Nights_,
Heche's romantic comedy from this past summer.  Given Van Sant's otherwise
obsessive determination in re-creating the feel of the original, hopefully
that distracting in-joke was unintentional.)
With the original updated yet completely intact, from the story to the
music (Bernard Herrmann's famously chilling score has been adapted by Danny
Elfman) to the opening titles (adapted by Pablo Ferro from the legendary
Saul Bass's original design), it's easy to see how Universal and Van Sant
thought this experiment could work.  But a crucial fact about the original
film is lost on them: while rightfully regarded as a classic, when seen in
this day and age, _Psycho_ works best only when its original historical
context is in mind--that is, as a film emerging from the year 1960.  There
are more than a few things in the original that comes off as dated when
seen through contemporary eyes: the deliberate pacing, the low body count,
and, most infamously, the horrible "this is why it all happened" closing
expository speech delivered by a psychiatrist (here played by Robert
Forster).  Having all of this distinctly '60s material played out by '90s
performers in living color makes for a film that feels jarringly
anachronistic; those modern wrinkles just accentuate the time era conflicts.
What isn't so confused, however, is the troupe of actors--for the most
part, that is.  Heche and William H. Macy (as private investigator
Arbogast) are especially effective.  (However, it must be noted that
perhaps Heche's most memorable contribution to the role, as good as she is
actingwise, is wearing a truly hideous straight-from-the-thrift-shop
wardrobe that the original's Janet Leigh wouldn't be caught dead in.)  The
big shortcoming is the cast, though, is Vaughn.  He is a terrific actor,
and, technically speaking, he delivers a decent performance.  But there is
something inherently wrong about his casting as Norman; a lot of his appeal
and effectiveness on-screen comes from the natural, almost subconscious
self-confidence he exudes, which does not fit the awkward, socially inept
Norman at all.  Granted, this is Vaughn's most muted performance to date,
but the creepy ambiguity of Anthony Perkins is nowhere in sight;
consequently, there is no suspense leading to, nor any surprise coming
with, the climactic twist, even if one has not seen the original.
All comparisons to any other films aside, the measure of a thriller is its
suspense and scariness factor, and, on its own terms, Van Sant's _Psycho_
is a suspiciously average undertaking--watchable, competent on technical
terms, yet strangely safe.  _Psycho_ '98 doesn't ruin anyone's memory of
the original; in fact, it only makes one appreciate that film more--which,
ironically, appears to have been the point that Van Sant has been accused
of not having. 
-_American_History_X_ (R) *** 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt40.html#historyx
-_Antz_ (PG) *** 1/2 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt39.html#antz
-_Babe:_Pig_in_the_City_ (G) ** 1/2 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt42.html#babe
-_Belly_ (R) ** 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt41.html#belly
-_Beloved_ (R) *** 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt40.html#beloved
-_A_Bug's_Life_ (G) *** 1/2 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt42.html#bugs
-_Bulworth_ (R) *** 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt34.html#bulworth
-_Celebrity_ (R) **  
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt42.html#celebrity
-_The_Cruise_ (PG-13) *** 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt41.html#cruise
-_Elizabeth_ (R) *** 1/2 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt40.html#elizabeth
-_Enemy_of_the_State_ (R) *** 1/2 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt42.html#enemy
-_Happiness_ **** 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt40.html#happiness
-_Home_Fries_ (PG-13) ** 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt42.html#home
-_I_Still_Know_What_You_Did_Last_Summer_ (R) * 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt41.html#istillknow
-_The_Last_Emperor_ Director's Cut ****
-_Life_Is_Beautiful_(La_Vita_E_Bella)_ (PG-13) **** 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt40.html#vitabella
-_Little_Voice_ (R) *** 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt41.html#lv
-_Living_Out_Loud_ (R) *** 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt41.html#living
-_Meet_Joe_Black_ (PG-13) *** 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt42.html#joe
-_Pleasantville_ (PG-13) *** 1/2 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt40.html#pleasantville
-_Ringmaster_ (R) no stars 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt42.html#ringmaster
-_The_Rugrats_Movie_ (G) *** 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt42.html#rugrats
-_The_Siege_ (R) ** 1/2 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt41.html#siege
-_Velvet_Goldmine_ (R) ** 1/2 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt41.html#velvet
-_Very_Bad_Things_ (R) **** 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt42.html#bad
-_Waking_Ned_Devine_ (PG) *** 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt41.html#ned
-_The_Waterboy_ (PG-13) ** 
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt41.html#waterboy
-_The_Wizard_of_Oz_ (G) ****
_Jack_Frost_ (PG) ** 1/2 
Kids will enjoy this harmless effects-laden fantasy about a young boy
(Joseph Cross) whose dead father's (Michael Keaton) spirit returns to him
in the form of a snowman.  Adults, on the other hand, will get bored once
the novelty value wears off.  Kelly Preston and Mark Addy also star.
_Lolita_ (R) ** 1/2
Full review in MR#151, 7/24/98; and at:
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt37.html#lolita
Returning to theatres for a five-day Academy "reminder" engagement after a
one-week Oscar-qualifying run in July and a few airdates on Showtime (got
that?) is Adrian Lyne's well-acted but ice cold adaptation of Vladimir
Nabokov's novel about a professor (Jeremy Irons) and his underage object of
desire (Dominique Swain).
_Rushmore_ (R) **** 
Wes Anderson's funny, wildly original comedy about a 15-year-old (Jason
Schwartzman) who falls for a teacher (Olivia Williams) at his private
school opens in New York in Los Angeles for a one-week Oscar-qualifying
engagement.  Bill Murray and Luke Wilson also star.
_Shakespeare_in_Love_ (R)
Romantic comedy about the Bard (Joseph Fiennes) and the lady (Gwyneth
Paltrow) who inspired _Romeo_and_Juliet_.  Ben Affleck and Judi Dench also
star for director John Madden, a veteran of British period pieces
(_Mrs._Brown_).
_A_Simple_Plan_ (R) ****
Full review in MR#167, 11/20/98; and at:
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt42.html#plan
Excellent psychological thriller in which two brothers (Bill Paxton and
Billy Bob Thornton) and their friend (Brent Briscoe) scheme to keep $4
million they find in a downed plane.  Also starring Bridget Fonda and
expertly directed by Sam Raimi, this is one of the very best films of the
year.
_Star_Trek:_Insurrection_ (PG) ** 
Only the most devout Trekkers will enjoy this tepid, vapid ninth
installment of the long-running sci-fi franchise, in which Capt. Picard
(Patrick Stewart) and the rest of the Enterprise crew protect a peaceful
planet from an evil alien (F. Murray Abraham).
_Still_Crazy_ (R) **
Full review in MR#169, 12/3/98; and at:
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt42.html#crazy
Opening for a one-week Oscar-qualifying run is this decidedly
award-unworthy British comedy about a (fictional) '70s rock band staging a
comeback.  Stephen Rea, Jimmy Nail, Bill Nighy, Timothy Spall, Juliet
Aubrey, and Hans Matheson star in the film, which is ultimately more silly
than funny.
_Two_Girls_and_a_Guy_ (R) **
Full review in MR#137, 4/10/98; and at:
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt31.html#2girls
Also returning to the big screen for a brief (two weeks) Oscar "reminder"
run is James Toback's stagy talkfest in which two angry young women
(Heather Graham and Natasha Gregson Wagner) confront the man (Robert Downey
Jr.) who has been simultaneously romancing them.  Fox Searchlight is
gunning for a Best Actor nod for Downey; don't bet on it.
_Six_Days,_Seven_Nights_ (PG-13) no stars
Full review in MR#146, 6/11/98; and at:
http://www.godamongdirectors.com/mrbrown/movierpt35.html#67
Rent or buy at Reel.com:
http://www.reel.com/cgi-bin/nph-session.exe?COBRAND=MRBR&OBJECT=moviepage.as
p?MMID=41559
Slight but fun romantic adventure about a pilot (Harrison Ford) and a
magazine editor (Anne Heche) stranded on an uninhabited Hawaiian island.
(Touchstone Home Video)
_The_Parent_Trap_ (PG)
Rent or buy at Reel.com:
http://www.reel.com/cgi-bin/nph-session.exe?COBRAND=MRBR&OBJECT=moviepage.as
p?MMID=42134
Hit remake of the 1961 family comedy, in which a pair of twins (Lindsay
Lohan) conspire to get their estranged parents (Dennis Quaid and Natasha
Richardson) back together.  (Walt Disney Home Video)
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@iname.com   |  michael_jordan@geocities.com
Mr. Brown's Movie Site: http://welcome.to/mrbrown
CompuServe Hollywood Hotline: http://www.HollywoodHotline.com


Author
David Wilcock
Starring Vince Vaughn, Julianne Moore and Anne Heche
Directed By Gus Van Sant
Although this remake of Alfred Hitchcocks classic Psycho (1960) seems to
want to be taken seriously, it comes across as nothing but an oddity made by
an overly ambitious film student. The film, nearly a scene to scene remake,
comes across as pointless to those who have seen the original. The classic
story, about Norman Bates (Vaughn) who has a bloodthirsty mother who kills
Marion Crane (Heche,) who has stolen $400,000, is familiar to many. Which
means the shocks and scares the original had are nearly lost. Also, because
the film is almost exactly the same, it can't be said that this remake is an
attempt to better the original.
Still, it's a pleasant film, with no major flaws. Anne Heche is excellent as
Marion, carrying the entire first half of the film with ease. She's better
than Janet Leigh, delivering a much more rounded and tougher performance,
yet still keeping that daffy, angelic look that the role requires. Julianne
Moore as her sister is also very good, leaving an impact on the audience
even if she isn't the film very long. William H. Macy is as dependable as
ever as the the private investigator who is trying to piece together the
mystery. It's seems that it's impossible for Macy to deliver a poor
performance, and he doesn't disappoint here. But while the supporting cast
is fine, including Viggo Mortensen as Marions husband Sam Loomis, there are
some problems with Vince Vaughns performance as Norman Bates, the jittery
owner of the Bates motel. Rather than coming across as naturally nervous
like Anthony Perkins outstanding performance, Vaughn is quite obviously
faking the jitteriness, including an horribly forced giggle. His performance
is almost campy, it's like he's a bully doing an impression of the wimpy kid
at school. His frame is also too imposing to look like the nice man who is
extreme mothers boy. Considering  the film centres around his character, he
does seem to drag the film down with him. It's a shame, because the rest of
the cast were very good.
Apart from the cast and setting (the film is now set in a bizarre 1998 where
60's clothes still rule supreme) nothing much has changed from the original
shocker. Director Gus Van Sant always intended this to be as faithful as
possible, and from the Saul Bass credits sequence to the infamous shower
scene, nothing much has changed. Van Sant has basically shown what the film
would be like if it was filmed in colour. The bird symbolism still exists,
and there's a clever scene where the audience sees Hitchcocks cameo from the
original film. (A look-a-like is standing outside Marions workplace.) The
direction is fine, the script as good as it ever was, the music still
shrieking and tension inducing (the music now produced by Danny Elfman.) But
even though Psycho is an enjoyable movie, there just this strange feeling
that there's no point to this remake. Nothing has been changed (except from
the inclusion of a few butt shots just for the sake of it) and, in honesty,
Hitchcock seemed to handle the film better than today's Hollywood.
Obviously, after the success of Good Will Hunting (1997) Van Sant was given
the opportunity to direct whatever film he wanted, and it was probably his
'ambition' to recreate Psycho for the nineties. It's a nice idea, and it may
appeal to today's younger audience, but for the rest who have seen and
enjoyed the original, this reworking is somewhat a waste of time. I'd
recommend the film, but only for novelty value.
DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!
"You know, for kids"- Norville Barnes

Author
Wallace Baine
Alfred Hitchcock makes his obligatory cameo appearance in the original
`Psycho' early on in the movie. From inside a storefront office, we see
Hitchcock's unmistakable profile standing on the sidewalk outside, waiting
for a cab perhaps, his face turned away.
Gus Van Sant's absurdly obedient remake contains the same shot. But the
difference is telling. Van Sant doesn't merely take Hitchcock's place, to
wait for his own cab. Here, from the same office and from the same angle,
we see two men instead of one: Gus Van Sant, facing us, chatting amiably
with the same melon-shaped figure we briefly glanced the first time.
There is a point at which admiration bleeds over into adoration and because
Van Sant has so clearly crossed that line, Alfred Hitchcock is afforded a
uniquely bizarre media-age tribute. His movies aren't being re-invented;
they're being cloned. This new `Pyscho' is less a remake than the most
hyped karoake act in history. Its only distinguishing feature is color
film. Other than that, it's the same movie.
Of course, Van Sant is making no apologies. Enlisting the help of
Hitchcock's widow Pat, who appeared in the original, Van Sant worked from
Joseph Stefano's 1960 script and, in fact, used freeze frames from
Hitchcock's film to make his own. Stud film composer Danny Elfman pulled a
similarly monkey-see-monkey-do act on Bernard Herrman's original
screeching-violins score.
The result is a film that draws attention to its anachronisms. Corny
cinematic techniques common in the age of black-and-white -- echo-chamber
interior dialogue, swirling, fake-looking backdrops -- are kept intact.
Though Van Sant makes a point to make his story contemporary (the date in
the opening shot is Dec. 11, 1998, 2:43 p.m.), there are certain aspects,
namely the throwback wardrobes, that make the setting in time delightfully
ambiguous. Is there, for example, in this day and age, an office in
Phoenix, Arizona without air conditioning?
The acting, however, is thoroughly contemporary. Anne Heche who plays the
doomed Marion Crane is much more nuanced and world-weary than Janet Leigh
in the original. In the film's first scene, when Marion is getting dressed
in a by-the-hour hotel after a session of lovemaking with her lover Sam
(Viggo Mortensen), she delivers the same line Leigh had done 40 years
earlier: `I'll lick the stamps,' except that this time Sam in standing near
the window nude and Heche's eyes slide daringly below his waist.
I would have liked to see more of that kind of ironic script
re-interpretation. But from that point on, the film mostly stays earnestly
true to the original. Julianne Moore, who plays the Vera Miles role as
Marion's worried sister, carries a distinct post-feminist aggressiveness
which goes along fine with the Walkman headphones draped around her neck.
But William H. Macy, in the Martin Balsam role of the private investigator,
has the practiced look of a 1950s film-noir gumshoe.
To those who have never seen the original `Psycho' -- and you have to
believe that even a significant number of people who've come of age in the
`Scream' generation have seen it on video -- Vince Vaughn might make a
compelling Norman Bates. But in a film that all but begs comparison with
the original, Vaughn pales next to Tony Perkins. The significance of
Hitchcock's `Psycho' is that it was one of the first horror films to
suggest that monsters can indeed hide in amiable, clean-cut, mother-loving
nice guys. Perkins, with his Eddie Haskell grin and bright-eyed
attentiveness, was the perfect embodiment of that idea.
These days, however, such an image and the psychological theories of split
personalities that underly it are old news, hardly shocking even to
fourth-graders. We live in O.J.'s America, after all. Norman Bates can't
surprise us anymore.
Which is my problem with Vince Vaughn, a solid actor who for all his gifts
can't mask the fact that he could be a wacko. We are much more skeptical as
filmgoers these days to buy Vaughn as Bates. It would be more surprising if
Vaughn's Bates turned out to be an innocent guy.
Taken on its own merits, Van Sant's `Psycho' is a stylish, attractive
remake. You can't quibble with a movie so tight in plot and
characterization. But in context, watching this `Psycho' is a weird
experience. To anyone familiar with Hitch's movie, it is nigh near
impossible to lose yourself in the story of a young woman in trouble who
meets a brutal end by a chance encounter at a seedy hotel. You won't be
paying attention to the story of Marion Crane. You'll be paying attention
to how Anne Heche is playing Marion Crane and that uses a different set of
esthetic muscles. Gus Van Sant makes the assumption that most movie-goers
watch films with the same corrupted technical eye of the would-be director.
He does nothing to help us suspend that disbelief.

Author
David Butterworth
        You have to admit it's a pretty nifty tagline.   But you'd have to
*be*  a psycho to review Gus Van Sant's redo of the Alfred Hitchcock
masterpiece, so I won't even attempt it here.  I mean, what are you going
to say?  "Van Sant's picture surpasses the original "Psycho" in style,
substance, and shock value."  Or "Director Gus Van Sant has thrown together
a disastrous film that makes the 1987 television movie "Bates Motel" appear
Oscar-worthy by comparison."
        No.  Chances are your comments are going to fall somewhere in
between.  And that's the basket into which I'm putting all my eggs.
        Van Sant is no hack, and has been slowly gaining a reputation as a
mainstream filmmaker since his early directorial days, when controlled
substances featured as heavily as the characters in his films ("Drugstore
Cowboy," "My Own Private Idaho," "Even Cowgirls Get the Blues").  Many
people missed the fact that Van Sant was the man behind "Good Will
Hunting"; his star was eclipsed by two young up-and-comers named Matt Damon
and Ben Affleck.
        Given his off-beat but critical success ("Cowgirls" excepted), Van
Sant isn't likely to trash Hitch's classic film (although one of his
reasons for remaking it is "to do it in color"--sounds a tad suspect to say
the least).  His version of "Psycho" is less a remake and more a
scene-by-scene reconstruction, with all of the original dialogue intact.
        In fact, Van Sant's goal was to "update" the story by taking
advantage of some of the innovations in the medium that weren't available
in 1960 (a helicopter's eye view of a motel room, for example).
        The story, by Robert Bloch, was inspired by the real life exploits
of Ed Gein, a cannibalistic mass-murderer who turned his picturesque
Wisconsin farmhouse into a human abattoir (Gein was also the inspiration
behind "The Texas Chainsaw Massacre" and the lesser-seen "Deranged").
"Psycho" tells the tale of Marion Crane, a disenchanted real estate worker
who embezzles $40,000 and escapes town in order to marry her boyfriend,
Sam.  On her way to meet Sam, Marion stops at the Bates Motel run by a
troubled young man called Norman who, it turns out, is very much tied to
his mother's apron strings.
        Crane (played by Janet Leigh in the original and Anne Heche in the
update) buys it in the first few reels--an innovative and rarely imitated
idea--and Norman Bates was so immortalized by Anthony Perkins in the 1960
film that Perkins couldn't get any non-psycho offers for a long while
afterwards.  Vince Vaughn plays Norman in the remake.
        If you haven't seen Hitchcock's "Psycho" (and still want to having
read this far), I implore you to rent it *before* settling down to watch
Van Sant's interpretation.  The version that hits the theaters December 4th
doesn't have Saul Bass' superb editing (the infamous shower sequence,
arguably), Bernard Herrmann's screeching violins, or John Russell's eerie
black and white photography but, for better or worse, it does have that
very satisfying publicity campaign.

Author
Steve Rhodes
Yes, that is the obvious question.  Why would director Gus Van Sant want
to reconstruct the Alfred Hitchcock classic from 1960, PSYCHO?  And why,
instead of reinterpreting it, did he actually recreate the film
shot-by-shot with precisely the same timing and camera angles.  He even
arranged for his crew to shoot it on the same six-week schedule that
Hitchcock used.
Van Sant has said that one of his motivations was to get inside the head
of the great director, which presumably he now has.
The question is why -- other than curiosity -- would audiences want to
see it?  It is here that Van Sant provides no answers.
Whereas the original was fascinating and shocking, the reconstruction is
bland and lifeless.  The reconstruction could easily be summarized in a
single word -- tedious.
The original movie starred Anthony Perkins as Norman Bates, the motel
manager from Hell and Janet Leigh as the larcenous Marion Crane, his
victim.  The reconstruction is well cast but not well acted.
Vince Vaughn isn't particularly creepy as Norman Bates.  He was much
better as a psycho earlier this year in CLAY PIGEONS.
The normally emotive Anne Heche plays Marion Crane with facial
expressions that border on blank slates.  Heche delivers probably the
weakest performance of her career.
To be fair, both actors may just have been following the director's
instructions, but it is truly a shame to see such talent wasted.
And they aren't the only excellent actors to appear in the film.  Also
on hand are Julianne Moore as Marion's sister, Viggo Mortensen as
Marion's boyfriend, William H. Macy as the private detective and Philip
Baker Hall as the sheriff.
Are there ANY differences?  Well, not many other than the obvious one of
a switch to color from the black-and-white original.  There are a few
modest changes, but I'll let you discover them.  Keeping your eye out
for them is one of the few ways to pass the time while waiting for the
movie to end.
One particularly infuriating semi-change is that the director can't make
up his mind on the time period.  He starts the movie by giving the year
as 1998, but he constantly confuses things by putting in ridiculous
looking take-offs on 1960s clothing and making the sets an eclectic
mixture of the two periods.
Van Sant drains all of the lifeblood out of the story, just like Norman
did on the animals in his taxidermy collection.  The result is just as
strange.  Why one would want to see either dead animals or a dead movie
is the mystery.
PSYCHO runs 1:45.  It is rated R for violence, nudity and sex and would
be fine for teenagers.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and trivia, go to http://surf.to/joblo
Thirty-eight years after the original release of Alfred Hitchcock's
classic thriller PSYCHO, director Gus Van Sant, best known for his
Oscar nominated film GOOD WILL HUNTING (7.5/10), takes on the task of
recreating an exact "replica" of the film, with up-to-date actors,
color film stock instead of black & white, and a few minor changes. 
PLOT:
Marion Crane decides to rob $400,000 from her employer in order to help
her lover get out of debt. She leaves town, but unexpectedly gets
caught in a rainstorm, and must stop off at the Bates Motel for a
night. This is where she meets Norman Bates, the owner of said
establishment. Norman operates the motel and takes care of his ill
mother. They talk and eat, after which she goes off to take a shower.
Thrilling moments ensue, as a private detective, Marion's lover and
sister all get involved in a mystery.
CRITIQUE:
Slow, well-manufactured film with solid performances by its leads,
doesn't have enough tension to be qualified a real thriller, and
basically makes you question its remake in the first place. This film
has some good moments, many long-winded scenes, an excellent eye for
style and great performances by actors who basically had to recreate
characters that were considered historical in the eyes of many
movie-goers. The one actor who stood out from the pack was definitely
the rising star of the year, Vince Vaughn, who took Anthony Perkins'
superb original performance, and added his own macabre touch of
surrealism.
The directing of this film was basically a "shot-for-shot" remake of
the original, and therein, remained extremely stylish and original, in
classic Hitchcock style. Van Sant did take some initiative in regards
to little changes here and there, but on the whole, the film still
played like it could have been set in the 50's or 60's. Having said
that, the film's main peg of disinterest for me was its slow pace and
even slower build-up. I guess I have just gotten used to the greater
quantity of thrills in the thrillers of nowaday, and just didn't
appreciate the snails pace build-up of this story in respect to its end
result.
Having said that, this film might be better appreciated by those who
never saw the original, since they would not be privy to the film's
basic story line and twist, allowing for a greater interest in the
mystery of the whole thing. All in all, the film does offer some great
performances by its actors, with Vaughn offering another standout
performance, some stylish cinematography, but ultimately runs at too
slow a pace, without offering enough real thrills, to keep me
interested. I think my good friend The Arrow said it best when he
turned to me at the end of this film and said "Unnecessary. Why not
re-release the original instead of this?" No real improvement, no real
surprises, just a recreation of a film that played very well in its
original state in the 60's, but suffers somewhat in its imitation form
of the 90's.
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
This new PSYCHO was shot at the same studio as the original and used
the same compressed six-week schedule. The film cost $20 million
compared to the $800,000 that Hitchcock spent on the original in 1960.
Director Gus Van Sant also makes a cameo in the film during the same
scene that Hitchcock himself made an appearance over 30 years ago. He
also thanks fellow director John Woo for the use of his "kitchen knife"
in the end credits of this film, and was one of the executive producers
on the 1995 film KIDS (8/10).
Nicole Kidman turned down the role that eventually went to Anne Heche
in this picture.
The bassist of the Red Hot Chili Peppers, Flea, makes an appearance in
this film as Viggo Mortensen's co-worker. He also played a part in Gus
Van Sant's classic pic MY OWN PRIVATE IDAHO (7.5/10), which starred
Keanu Reeves and River Phoenix, and rode in the ambulance alongside
River, on the night that he died from a drug overdose. His real name is
Michael Balzary, and he was born in Australia.
Vince Vaughn stands 6"5. When asked about the last time that he cried,
Vince offered this little anecdote: "When I was a small, small child,
Elvis was passing through Evanston, getting a hamburger. And he bought
me and my mama one. And he said, "Son, you've got a twinkle in your
eye, don't let anybody tell you that you can't do this. And that was
the last time I cried." Vaughn's big break came when he appeared in a
nationally televised Chevrolet commercial in 1989. Steven Spielberg was
impressed with Vaughn's performance in SWINGERS (8.5/10), after he saw
a tape of the film when the film's producers approached him about the
possibility of using the theme music from JAWS (7.5/10) for a scene in
which Vaughn's Trent cozies up to an unsuspecting young woman at a
party. Spielberg liked him enough to cast him in the monster hit THE
LOST WORLD (7/10).
Julianne Moore's real name is Julie Anne Smith.
Actress Rita Wilson, who plays the other secretary in this film, is Tom
Hanks' wife in real life.

Author
Bob Bloom
 Pyscho (1998) 3 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Vince Vaughn, Anne Heche,
Viggo Mortensen, Julianne Moore and William H. Macy
 Here's a philosophical pastry to chew on while you're sipping your morning
latte.
 A painter announces he has created an exact replica of the Mona Lisa down
to the original hues and shading, and he's offering it for sale.
 The original is your favorite work of art, and the only difference between
the two is that while the original is signed Leonardo, this replica is
signed Fred.
 So, would you buy it? Probably not, because no matter how beautiful it is,
it's worthless. Why? Because it's a copy, a re-creation of another person's
vision, work and sweat.
 Which brings us to Psycho. Director Gus Van Sant has not remade the Alfred
Hitchcock classic, he has copied it, using Hitch's setups and storyboards,
as well as Joseph Stefano's original screenplay. The only major difference:
Van Sant's version is in color, while Hitchcock's original was shot in
black and white.
 Another difference is today's audiences and their cognizance of movies.
 In 1960, when Psycho was released, moviegoers had certain expectations, a
certain perception of what a film was supposed to do. In Psycho, Hitchcock
set out to deliberately shatter those ingrained ideas.
 Never before was a film's "star" dispatched so early, nor so brutally, as
was Janet Leigh when she stepped into that shower. The psychological effect
on an audience was mind-blowing. It unnerved viewers. The person they
thought they were identifying with, the character they believed would be
with them until the closing credits, was cruelly murdered and dumped. It
was no dream, there was no escape.
 What other conventions would Hitchcock break? Expectation kept the
audience on edge, which is exactly what Hitch wanted.
 Granted, many filmgoers in their 20s and 30s have never seen Psycho, but
the movie's title and the name Norman Bates have become ingrained in our
collective pop culture lexicon.
 The missing ingredient in Van Sant's version is the shock value, the
defiance of movie conventions that Hitchcock set out to break. You may not
have seen the original movie, but you know what is to come and who turns
out to be who.
 Thus the senses are dulled, your level of expectation anesthetized.
 Van Sant gets workmanlike performances from his Anne Heche, Julianne
Moore, William H. Macy and Viggo Mortensen.
 The only problem, ironically, is Vince Vaughn's interpretation of Norman
Bates. Vaughn, from the outset, seems like a loose cannon, a nut case, a
psycho. Unlike Anthony Perkins who, at first, appeared as a shy mama's boy,
Vaughn adds an extra layer of menace to his Norman that renders Van Sant's
film a bit a-kilter.
 Again, perception is everything. Before he played Norman Bates, Perkins
was best known as a young juvenile lead - Gary Cooper's son in Friendly
Persuasion, the young Cornelius Hackel in The Matchmaker. It was Psycho
that transformed Perkins' career, typecasting him as a maladjusted
individual.
 Unfortunately for Vaughn, he recently played a similar weirdo in Clay
Pigeons, so he already has a reputation for oddball characters.
 Wisely, Van Sant had composer Danny Elfman adapt Bernard Herrmann's
original score, which, as in the original, heightens the suspense.
 So, is Van Sant's Psycho as good as Hitchcock's? Yes, but the question is
moot. For who deserves the credit? Van Sant or Hitchcock?
 The only way to answer that question is for you to rent the original and
judge for yourself.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, Ind.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Universal Pictures
 Director:  Gus Van Sant
 Writer:  Joseph Stefano, original by Alfred Hitchcock
 Cast: Vince Vaughn, Anne Heche, Julianne Moore, Viggo
Mortensen, William H. Macy
   "You'd better watch out for the quiet guys," they always
told us, and if you think that's just an expression, see
"Psycho."  Alfred Hitchcock's original 1960 version, based on
a novel by Robert Bloch and a screenplay by Joseph
Stefano, was so scary that three sequels followed, plus a TV
movie, "Bates Motel."  Some say that the Hitchcok murder
set-pieces are so potent, they can frighten even a viewer
who's seen them before.  Because every detail of the
Hitchcok offering was flawless, even the endlessly imitated
score by Bernard Hermann, you can't blame Gus Van Sant
for wanting to direct this third sequel--almost exactly following
the script, design, and music of the classic terror trip made
thirty-six years ago.  And why not?  There's a whole
generation out there that has never seen the archetype, nor
are many of its members the sort who'd rent videos of
movies that are more than two years old.  
   Unfortunately, times have changed.  The 1960 "Psycho"
whose shower scene broke new ground in gore, is tame. 
The extra blood generated by the design team doesn't make
a dent in shock value.  Strangely enough, though, the prosaic
poster showing murder victim Marion Crane (Anne Heche)
behind a shower curtain was banned in Boston, but not even
her limp body, now thrust across the bathtub's borders with
backside gravity, would stir anyone who is even slightly less
repressed than Ken Starr.
   If it were simply a matter of time's passing the fever-pitch
thriller by, we could tell director Van Sant, "Nice try."  But
while he has followed the master's style almost religiously,
what's missing is the indispensable factor that separates art
from technique.  There's an indefinable something that
Hitchcock brought to the movie, but if we were to define
what's missing in four words, think "Anthony Perkins" and
"Janet Leigh."  Anne Heche is a fine actress but in this
slightly dumbed-down version she is apparently directed to
express her inner state by a series of grimaces and tics and
moans.  Janet Leigh did not need to do this: less is more. 
Not appreciating this concept, Van Sant installed a
masturbation scene.  When Marion undresses for her shower
and is spied on through motel owner Norman Bates' one-way
glass, Bates (Vince Vaughn) masturbates in much the style of
Billy (Rufus Reed) in "Happiness," and Ted (Ben Stiller) in
"There's Something About Mary."  Not only is this overkill, but
as Harry Knowles points out in his website review of the
movie, homicidal maniacs do not get off by masturbation but
only by killing.
   "Psycho" deals with a young woman, Marion Crane (Anne
Heche) who steals $400,000 form one of his boss's clients
and, while hightailing it to some island, is forced by a storm
to stop at a motel off the beaten path.  Welcomed by the
friendly Norman Bates (Vince Vaughn), who is obviously
turned on by her, she has a sandwich in his office and then
retreats to cabin 1 for a shower and sleep.  She never gets
past the tub.  When her boy friend (Viggo Mortensen) and
sister (Julianne Moore) search for her, they are at first
charmed by the gregarious motel director, but find him not so
pleasant and his mother even less fetching. Everything has
been brought up to date except for the private investigator,
who is played by William H. Macy as though he had just
come out of a time machine from the 1940s.  
   Vince Vaughn simply does not convey Norman's inner
madness with Anthony Perkins's elan, nor can Viggo
Mortensen, who comes across as somehow eccentric, match
the undeviating John Gavin in the 1960 work.  Perhaps the
producers should have heeded critic Leonard Maltin, who
said thirteen years ago in reviewing "Psycho III," "just some
gratuitous blood and unpleasantness...Good night, Norman."

Author
Brandon Herring
Rated R: violence, sexuality, nudity.
Starring: Anne Heche, Vince Vaughn, Viggo Mortenson, Julianne Moore, William 
H. Macy, Robert Forester, Phillip Baker Hall, Rita Wilson and Mother.
When the word first came out that Hitch's masterpiece "Psycho" was going to 
be remade, everyone put the thoughts in their head that this was the worst 
thing anyone could ever do, how could you fix something that wasn't broken? 
The movie opened in December of '99 to a $10 million dollar opening weekend, 
and soon died out with only $22 million to it's name. A huge flop to a lot of 
peoples minds, and 75% of the people who saw it despised it,20% of the 
people who saw it, thought it was OK, and the other 5% loved it. It's a 
scene-for-scene pointless remake that is enjoyable in it's own way of a 
homage to the original.
The story we all know, has Marion Crane (played quite well by Anne Heche) who 
is a very well-liked banker, on the run after stealing $400,000 from a 
trusting customer, she ends up at a hotel lost on the side of the highway run 
by an eccentric young man named Norman Bates (Vince Vaughn who is good in his 
role, but over the top at times). Norman invites the girl to stay at the 
hotel, and even invites her to dinner in his din. Norman's mother however 
does not like the fact of a girl in her din with her son, and Marion goes to 
her room for the night, only to be surprised in the shower, getting stabbed 
to death. Now her sister and her boyfriend must investigate her murder and 
find out who killed this young woman with (and if you don't know the twist 
your crazy) a great little twist at the end.
"Psycho" has alot going for it, it has some great performances especially by 
Julianne Moore who plays Lila Crane, Marion's sister. I have always loved 
Julianne Moore's performances and her best so far being in 1997's "Boogie 
Nights" or 1999's "Magnolia". Viggo Mortenson plays the boyfriend but he 
seems quite pulled back and not really giving all he can, which to me I don't 
even think he is a great actor. William H. Macy I will say right now gives 
the best performance as usual, as Detective Arbagast, he is easy going in his 
role and seems to be having a ball playing his character. The other 
performances are very well brought out with some great cameos.
Gus Van Sant's direction is another story, he is a very good director and it 
shows here, the shower scene is quite exquisite and almost seems more intense 
than the original. The biggest flaw in this film is the fact that its scene 
for scene, and nothing has been changed, its like watching a colorized 
version of the original, and at times seems out of place. I do agree with 
people who say it is a pointless movie, because why remake a classic if 
nothing is wrong with it? The original stands out as being one of the best 
horror films ever, and this remake to me tributes to the original, rather 
than trying to top the original. In now way did I ever feel this movie was 
trying to be better than the original, and I went into the theatre thinking 
of a homage rather than a remake.
For all you despisers of this movie, try watching it again and just think 
that Gus Van Sant was trying to make a homage rather than a remake, or top 
the original type movie, because as well all know it will never top the 
original. With some terrific performances, great directing, and some 
suspenseful scenes, "Psycho" is a remake that even though not as good as the 
original, still an enjoyable tribute to the man himself.
Reviewed by Brandon Herring 12-20-98

Author
Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 stars
Hiring Gus Vant Sant to direct a 90's version of Alfred Hitchcock's
Psycho makes just about as much sense as hiring Pauly Shore to play
Norman Bates.  Hitchock had more than thirty years of experience in the
suspense/thriller genre before he tackled Psycho, and the result was the
work of a true genius.  Van Sant, on the other hand, has had about as
third of that with mostly drama, and his result is something much less
spectacular.  No doubt David Fincher (Se7en, The Game) or Brian De Palma
(Mission: Impossible, Snake Eyes) would probably have made a better
film, but Hitcock's mesmerizing original is not the kind of experience
that can be adequately duplicated.  The reason, of course, is that it is
no longer the 1960's!
Could you imagine what a scene by scene remake of The Wizard of Oz would
be like? It wouldn't work, and it wouldn't work because the era in which
it reflected has long surpassed. The 90's have been the domicile for
some smart horror films (the Scream series, the Italian gem Dellamorte
Dellamore, and a few more) and countless others drenched in sex appeal.
Psycho is not sex-crazed nor is it incredibly smart; it is a dark and
mysterious story with a clever twist at its climax.  Therefore one might
presume that Psycho in the 90's has a restricted audience, and some
horror fans will no doubt have trouble accepting that there are no shots
of Jennifer Lover Hewitt's breasts nor any fun self-satire.  The film is
old fashioned, and in the process of carefully re-creating it step by
step, Van Sant seems to have forgotten to package Pyscho for a 90's
audience, consequently missing the excitement and thrill of Hitchcock's
60's package.
The recent A Perfect Murder, a remake of Hitchcock's Dial M for Murder,
was not a great film or even a good one - but it at least took advantage
of a modern setting.  Now that the thrill of Norman Bates' demented mind
has gone, Pyscho in the 90's loses it intrigue.  Van Sant hasn't remade
it so much as he has copied it, and the only real reason why this film
is not a total disaster is the charm and simplicity of the original,
which often shines through.
Working girl Marion Crane (Anne Heche) is presented with $400,000 from
her employee to deposit in a bank.  Naturally, she decides to split town
with the loot and start a new life.  When night falls and rain floods
the road ahead of her, Marion pulls off the highway and stops at the
secluded Bates Motel.  Norman Bates (Vince Vaughn) runs the Motel, and
is immediately attracted to Marion, although his sick mother forbids any
relationships. Marion unpacks and takes a shower, and some unlikely
events unfold
One interesting thing that I didn't notice with the original Psycho was
how heavily the film relied on Bates to make an intriguing central
character. It is then a big disappointment that Vince Vaughn is terribly
miscast.  Though he acts the part well, Vaughn is physically
inappropriate for the role, always looking far too menacing.  Instead of
portraying a mentally unstable, seemingly harmless character that
Anthony Perkins did so well in the original, Vaughn looks like a killer
from the start.
Those who haven't seen the original should by all means have the
opportunity to see Psycho on a big screen.   A smarter choice would have
been to clean up the original print and ship it into as many cinemas as
possible.  Grease did that in 1998, and it worked as a retrospective
look at a classic movie.  It makes no sense to keep a 60's product as
the foundation for a 90's one, even if such a movie has survived as one
of the greatest of its genre for almost forty years.  Van Sant's Psycho
manages to keep a reasonable level of suspense throughout, and as I
mentioned before, the original screenplay has too much charm and
simplicity not to let any leak through into its remake.  But lets face
it, a far superior version of Psycho has always been available in the
90's - located in the classics section of your local video store.  If
you haven't seen it, see it.  It's also probably a good choice to avoid
any future Van Sant remakes, who knows - Lawrence of Arabia might be
next.

Email bucky@alphalink.com.au to subscribe to my newsletter (unless, of
course, you already have) or for any inquiries or feedback

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Psycho (1998)
Vince Vaughn, Anne Heche, Julianne Moore, Viggo Mortensen,
William H. Macy, Robert Forster, Philip Baker Hall, Anne Haney, Chad 
Everett, Rance Howard, Rita Wilson, James Remar, James Legros, Steven 
Clark Pachosa, O.B. Babbs, Flea. Music by Bernard Herrmann. Screenplay by 
Joseph Stefano, based on the novel by Robert Bloch. Produced by Brian 
Grazer and Gus Van Sant. Directed by Gus Van Sant. 104 minutes.
Rated R, 2 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com
Archive reviews at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests to 
pbbp24a@prodigy.com
Generally, I take meticulous notes during film screenings, but about a 
third of the way through "Psycho," I simply closed my folder, sat back 
and put in my time. Taking notes on this exercise in cinematic mimicry 
seemed pointless. Almost as pointless as the movie.
When director Gus Van Sant made his decision to recreate Alfred 
Hitchcock's horror classic on as close to a shot-by-shot basis as 
possible, he forgot to factor in time. In 1960, "Psycho" was a shocker, 
but this is 1998 and Van Sant's pseudo-Xerox is flat, mannered and often 
downright boring.
Were Alfred Hitchcock alive and remaking "Psycho" today, the finished 
product wouldn't have looked anything like this. Hitchcock would have 
taken into account the myriad horror films released in the 38 years since 
the original, and revised his film accordingly. After exercises in terror 
like "Silence of the Lambs" and an endless stream of slasher flicks, it 
takes a lot to frighten contemporary audiences. Gus Van Sant refuses to 
acknowledge this and the result of his tunnel vision is sad.
His slavish adherence to the original is all the more frustrating because 
of the few cursory changes he does make. Aside from a couple of bare 
asses and some whacking-off sound effects, the most notable change is the 
dollar amount of the stolen money, bumped up from $40,000 to $400,000. If 
Van Sant saw the need to adjust for inflation, why did he stop there? 
Didn't he notice that his "Psycho" isn't particularly scary?
Most of the film just plods along, with Bernard Herrman's magnificent 
score providing far more momentum than anything onscreen. Except for Anne 
Heche, whose paranoid, guilt-ridden attempt at grand larceny is the most 
compelling part of the film, the cast comes up lacking. As Marion Crane, 
Heche gives the character much more depth than Janet Leigh, but her 
screen time is limited. Chad Everett overacts wildly in a minor role. 
Julianne Moore and Viggo Mortensen come off like a bargain basement 
Scully and Mulder, and William H. Macy, looking quite uncomfortable in 
ridiculously anachronistic clothing, is completely wasted.
And then there's Vince Vaughn. To his credit, Vaughn doesn't copy Anthony 
Perkin's landmark performance as Norman Bates. Unfortunately, Vaughn is 
too tall, too imposing and his acting too overtly sinister for the role, 
and his nervous giggle sounds affected. Norman Bates is supposed to 
appear deceptively mild-mannered, but Vaughn's Norman Bates appears 
merely deceptive. The talented actor was much more frightening in the 
recent "Clay Pigeons."
I went into Van Sant's "Psycho" with an open mind, but left the theater 
angry. The film is dedicated to Alfred Hitchcock, but does him a 
disservice by dragging one of his works into an age where it no longer 
fits. If all the publicity surrounding this project intrigues you, rent 
the original. You'll travel back to 1960 and enter an ominous black and 
white realm of shadows and suggestion. You can watch Hitchcock's "Psycho" 
and see a pivotal work that influenced a generation of filmmakers. Or you 
can sit through Van Sant's academic curio of the same name and leave the 
theater scratching your head. This shouldn't be a hard decision to make.

Author
Eric Vinegart
Written by Robert Bloch (novel) and Joseph Stefano
Friday, December 4, 1998, Tempe, AZ -- When I first heard about
another release of "Psycho", I wondered how on earth could anyone find
another way to beat this one to death.  But when it turned out this
one is a total clone, that piqued my interest.  Alfred Hitchcock's
1960 release was a favorite of mine when I first viewed it in the
seventies, and has stood the test of time whenever I saw it again.  In
fact, when I last experienced the classic about 10 years ago, I liked
it more than ever.  Seeing this new rendition seems like an exciting
opportunity to re-visit the original, only from a color and 1998
perspective.
Actually, I'm here at the AMC Laguna Theaters because my buddy,
Brandi, is absolutely crazy about "Psycho" and Anthony Perkins.  She's
been reminding me for more than a month now about this opening day,
and now that we are here, you'd think her excitement level was about
as high as someone who finally boarded a vacation flight for Europe,
after waiting a full year.  Brandi has seen all versions up to "Psycho
4", and I swear she has each scene memorized.  Talk about spectator
enthusiasm from someone who was not even born yet in 1960.
The story chronicles Marian Crane (Anne Heche), a Phoenix secretary
who steals $400,000 from her boss's client.  On her way out of town to
meet her boyfriend (Viggo Mortensen), she checks into the Bates Motel
for the night, which is owned by lives-with-a-corpse Norman Bates, a
taxidermist and dual-personality guy who is pleasant and engaging when
he is himself, but a psychopath when his dead mother's personality
takes over.  Marian is murdered in the shower, and her sister
(Julianne Moore) and private investigator (William H. Macy) begin a
search.  Eventually, we learn Norman murdered his mother and lover
years earlier, then exhumed and stuffed her to keep her memory alive,
all of which explains the dismal action of a psychopath.
I'm one who always must be seated before the movie starts, preferring
to glue my eyes to the credits while everyone else is still buying
popcorn and trying to find a seat (usually right in front of me).
Most people care little about the credits (or being rude by arriving
late), but some of the best photography takes place at the beginning.
It's the director's opportunity to set the stage.  But during the
beginning in "Psycho" (1998), there is no photography -- only credits
and music.  And I've got to admit, everyone in the theater is
spell-bound by the opening soundtrack.  No one's buying popcorn or
coming in late to this movie.  The trademark staccato violins are
magnificent.  And Brandi tells me she's got to have the soundtrack --
even before the credits finish.
So much has been said for the original classic (1960), which has its
share of flaws.  And I think the fanfare surrounding the original
"Psycho", though a masterpiece, has less to do with quality and
artistry, and more with the conscious-shocking value of a movie first
released during a time when social conservatism was much, much higher
than today.  It outraged a lot of people, and consequently received a
lot of notoriety, too.
I'm surprised the producers of this movie didn't find it odd to
re-make a movie using 1998 tense  and the original 1960s script nearly
verbatim.  It's simply not realistic for anyone today to pay cash for
any big-ticket purchase, and when I see the rancher belly-up $400,000
($40,000 in Hitchcock's "Psycho") in a downtown Phoenix real estate
office, I wonder, "Come on, get real".
Just try to buy a ticket at the airport today using cash.  Someone
will call the DEA and the drug-sniffing dogs, after which they'll take
away all your cash, even if they don't find contraband.  Of course,
had "Psycho's" tense been left intact, I believe this remake would
have turned out a lot better.  Doesn't it make us wonder why the
producers updated the script from $40,000 to $400,000?  Supposedly to
add more realism for 1998?  Okay, so why not make everything more
realistic?  I'd like to see Gus Van Sant pull this off with "Gone With
The Wind".
Marian Crane's (Anne Heche) encounter with the law is no less
unrealistic.  Even for anyone who has never watched "Cops", we all
know the police today will go off the deep end whenever they're
suspicious.  With their favorite weapon, the RICO Law, they always
find the slightest excuse to search your car so they can steal your
possessions and forfeiture your wheels.  Of course, this exact scene
in the original masterpiece plays well, given the 1960 era.  But it's
way out of character for 1998.  I can just visualize all the police
who are going to watch this new movie, and then water-at-the-mouth at
the sight of all that cash.  They'll also give the state trooper an
imaginary dope slap on the old noggin for not ceasing the money, which
is enough to promote the dweebiest cop who finds it to captain.
The shower scene is intense, and I can imagine that the impact on a
1960's audience would've been more shocking.  I really do think they
could have done without the bare-ass nude scene.  Who wants to look at
someone's butt anyway?  Maybe market research reveals that half the
movie-viewing audience now is perverted, and so directors, anxious to
squeeze the last dollar, want to appeal to everyone.
The violins are superb, and there's no mistaking the hopelessness of
Crane on her way, alone, into the next world.  Of course, the music
stands on its own, but with modern technology in music delivery today,
the screeching violins are too much for me.  I'm one who wants to
punch-out anyone who deliberately scratches a black board.
Brandi says she likes Anthony Perkins in this role better than she
likes Vince Vaughn.  Me, I like Vince better.  I absolutely love
actors who can play a psychopath -- charming one minute, cold and
calculated the next -- never nervous.  The guy next door.  Roddy
McDowall can do it (Martin Ashley, "Shock Treatment", 1964), and here
in "Psycho" I can see Vince doing an excellent job.  He's not as
serious as Perkins was in 1960, nor as one-dimensional, and displays a
much broader range of acting and personality.
Even though he didn't play the part of a psychopath, William H. Macy
demonstrated the same skill in "Fargo".  Here, as the investigator,
and given his talent, I'm expecting more from Macy.  But being
realistic, he would have to play Bates for that to happen.
"Psycho" is less of a remake and more of a scene-by-scene duplication,
with most, if not all, of the original script intact.  Which means the
flaws from 1960 will carry over.  Some of the scenes should've been
updated to convey more passage of time and distance.  I feel cheated
whenever a movie covers a lot of ground with too few transition
scenes.  In one setting, for example, Mortensen convinces his
girlfriend to stay at the store while he visits the Bates Motel, and
in the next he's already there.  Is this flop house across the street
or what?  Give us some sense of time and distance, so we don't wonder
why Marian didn't just keep her eyes open five minute longer and drive
to her boyfriend's place instead of staying at the motel.  The movie
is full of these flaws, all the way to the end when Bates is confined
in a jail cell in one scene, and in the next the psychiatrist offers
dual personality as explanation for the psychopath in him.  Remakes
should at least improve a movie, but we don't get that here.
An interesting footnote I learned is that Robert Bloch, the author of
the original story, is still alive, and that his book is based on a
real cannibal from Wisconsin.  Alfred Hitchcock purchased Bloch's
rights to "Psycho" for a mere $9,000.  Granted, that was almost fifty
years ago, so maybe that was a lot of money back when it would buy
four cars.  Today, however, would anyone trade screen rights for four
vehicles?
Psycho is a good movie.  Brandi gives it four stars, and not wanting
to be all together contrary, I'll go along with her.  Between you and
me, however, three and a half would be more like it.  It was fun to
see the story in color and from a new pair of eyes, and share it all
with one hell of a "Psycho" (and movie) enthusiast.

Author
Marty Mapes
*** (out of 4) There are three reasons why Universal might have withheld
screenings of PSYCHO from critics. Either 1) they knew it was a stinker,
2) they wanted to keep secret a new shocking twist, or 3) they were
merely paying homage to Hitchcock.
Thankfully, it wasn't the first reason. Though some hard-core fans of
the original may scoff at anything that tries to compete, Van Sant's
version of Psycho is actually pretty good.
It wasn't reason two, either. There was some speculation, especially in
Roger Ebert's Answer Man column, that perhaps the secrecy was meant to
disguise a new twist on Hitchcock's original. In fact, this version is a
very close remake of the original.
That leaves reason three. It appears that Van Sant and Universal were
actually trying to pay tribute not only to one of the all-time great
directors, but to one of his most memorable films. When the original
PSYCHO was released in 1960, Hitchcock and Universal withheld press
screenings to keep the audiences guessing. Van Sant is merely imitating
the master.
For the uninitiated, PSYCHO follows the story of Marion Crane, a
secretary in a real estate office. The opportunity to walk away with
$400,000 presents itself, and she takes it. She drives for several days,
trying to get far enough away to shake her pursuers. Late one night, in
a rainstorm, she decides to stop for the night at the Bates Motel. The
rest is history.
If you know your history, then I don't need to repeat it for you. If you
don't know your history, then it's better you find out for yourself. I
would recommend either version to you. I won't say this version is
better; it's not. But I acknowledge that some people have no desire to
rent a black and white movie for their 15-inch monaural TV. Given a
big-screen with big sound, this version may be the better way to get up
to speed on your cultural awareness.
This film isn't literally a shot-by-shot remake as some have claimed,
but it is very close. In fact, this kind of near-literal remake has
never been tried before. It was a fairly big gamble, especially
considering the possible backlash from die-hard fans. 
Nevertheless, it seems to have worked. The horrible and tense sequences
are recreated faithfully, resulting in a still-satisfying experience.
Trivia buffs could spend hours at the theaters comparing differences and
similarities (see "Did You Notice" on the sidebar at
http://net.indra.com/~mmapes/psy_ld98.htm for a handful of
examples). Yet some differences were unavoidable. Casting, set design,
costume design, and sound all had to be redone. Mostly, these decisions
were well made.
Vince Vaughn fills the role of Norman Bates. Others in the audience were
disappointed by this casting choice, but I was pleasantly surprised.
Vaughn had the right speech and mannerisms to fill the part. He was
meek, childish, and awkward in all the right proportions. Others faulted
him for having too much confidence for the role, and they do have a
point, but on the whole, Vaughn was great.
The only casting decision that I found to be a bad choice was William H.
Macy as the private investigator Arobgast. Macy's iconic face and tidy
haircut were perfect in PLEASANTVILLE, where he played a 50's sitcom
father figure. But because he is such an obvious choice for an
old-fashioned gumshoe, he stood out like a sore thumb. Everyone else
seemed modern in a world gone retro, but Macy seemed to actually come
from that era.
The set design and costume design were unavoidably modernized, but they
still had the look and feel of 1960. The real estate office looked
remarkably similar to the cheap set Hitchcock used in the original. The
hardware store was a far cry from today's big-box chains, and in fact it
looked a little out of place after seeing a new car dealership. Dresses
are loud and orange. Shirts are noisy and brash. Lamps are
salvation-army chic.  
Yet even if all this seems oddly outdated, it all contributes the
overall style of the film. Because the dialogue is reportedly unchanged,
the film was required to have a certain quaint, retro feel. (After all,
who in this day and age would say to a stranger, "if it don't gel, it
ain't Jell-O, friend".) The decision to use anachronistic elements does
a lot to support this old-fashioned dialogue and give the film a
coherent feel.
Bernard Herrmann's music from the original film was used to great
effect. Of all the elements, I believe the music was the least changed.
The fact that it still strikes terror in your heart speaks well to
Herrmann's talent. In addition, the soundtrack is more full and rich. At
times, you can hear inaudible whispers or buzzing flies. At one point
near the end, adept use of surround-sound technology enhances the
picture on the screen.
This film will invite all sorts of questions: Why do a shot-by-shot
remake? What was different from the original? Did the original need
updating? But the most important, most obvious question should be: Does
it work?
Creepiness and tension permeate this film. Even if you know the ultimate
outcome, you will still find yourself telling Marion not to stop at the
motel, not to change her clothes, and not to go into the shower. Even if
you know who lives with Norman in that big old house, you will shrivel
in anticipation as the house is searched.
Remakes of movies are always problematic: if you deviate too much,
you're open to criticism of changing the original. Yet if you follow too
closely, you give up any chance of improving on it. Van Sant took the
latter approach to its extreme, accepting that a close copy of the
original might still be pretty good 
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
Jerry Saravia
If anyone attempted to do a remake to the 1960 classic "Psycho," it should have
been the Master of Suspense himself, Alfred Hitchcock. He did that with "The
Man Who Knew Too Much." Hitch isn't around anymore and he's probably rolling in
his grave as director Gus Van Sant ("Drugstore Cowboy") attempts to step into
the limelight. This "Psycho" remake is a complete bastardization, a dull,
callous, near parodic film of little or no consequence. 
Granted, I am aware that they have used Joseph Stefano's original, excellent
screenplay (almost word for word), and Van Sant has adopted the same angles and
camera shots through most of the film. But this movie is a recreation, in the
literal sense, not a remake. It replicates the original, but with none of the
grace, stamina or conviction that the actors or the director brought to the
original. Anne Heche comes off best as Marion Crane, but we'll get back to her
in a minute.
              Anthony Perkins will always be Norman Bates, just as Harrison
Ford will always be Indiana Jones. Therefore, it is a shame to see another
actor step in his shoes. The shameful overacting by Vince Vaughn as Norman
Bates sheds no doubts in my mind. He has a self-deprecating type of laugh, but
he brings none of the wit, charm, or nervous tension associated with the
stuttering, sexually ambiguous Perkins. He's like a big baby who wouldn't harm
a fly, nor scare one either. 
              The marvelous cast on hand is a complete waste of time and
talent. There's Viggo Mortensen as Sam Loomis, originally played by John Gavin,
a hardware store owner who looks like he's poised to kill. Here's an actor
who's too seedy and animalistic to be normal, playing a boyfriend for the
second time in a Hitch remake, the first being the suspenseless "A Perfect
Murder." Julianne Moore is the biggest disappointment as the one-note
character, Lila Crane. I never imagined Moore to be faceless, unsympathetic,
and uninteresting, yet she manages all the same. Bring back Vera Miles! Worst
of all is William H. Macy as the flippant detective Arbogast dressed in a
blazing dark blue suit and wearing a ridiculous-looking fedora - how could
anyone take this guy seriously, including Norman? Macy's line readings are so
flat and antiseptic that I realized why the performers were so listless - they
brought no energy or conviction to their roles. They rattle through their line
readings quickly with no degree of nuance or diction. Ditto Robert Forster as
the psychiatrist in a final scene that was unnecessary in the original.
No one can blame the script, but you sure can blame Van Sant for
not recreating the feeling or the mood. There's no tension, no surprise. By the
time the marvelously sensual Anne Heche exits, the rest of the film flounders
searching for an identity. There is none. Philip Baker Hall is the only actor
who brings a sense of authority as Sheriff Chambers. Anne Heche brings class,
elegance and a wink of humor to Marion before she's offed. 
The original "Psycho" is one of the few great horror classics of all time.
I've seen and studied it at least thirty to forty times. I have committed most
of the camera shots and dialogue to memory. I can sense Van Sant's giddiness in
stepping in the Hitch's shoes, and seeing the film through his eyes. I wish Van
Sant would use that giddiness to make an original creation of his own. I just
don't see the justification in making a colorized recreation of a film that was
pitch-perfect. 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/ 

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director:  Gus Van Sant
Cast: Vince Vaughn, Julianne Moore, Viggo Mortensen, William H. Macy,
Philip Baker Hall, Anne Heche, Rita Wilson, Robert Forster
Screenplay: Joseph Stefano 
Producers: Brian Grazer
Runtime: 
US Distribution: Universal
Rated R: violence, sexuality, nudity
Copyright 1998 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
You know the story.  Marion Crane (Anne Heche, in this case) takes
$400,000 from her boss, skips town, and heads into the desert.  There,
she comes across the old Bates Motel, owned and run by Mr. Norman Bates
(Vince Vaughn).  If this story doesn't sound familiar to you, or if you
don't know what happens to Marion Crane at the Bates Motel, I suggest
you go out and rent a film called Psycho.  It was directed by Alfred
Hitchcock, and came out in 1960.  
Or, if you don't like black and white, you could go to the theater and
see Gus Van Sant's Psycho.  When my screening of Van Sant's version
ended, just a few hours ago, I felt that the most appropriate review
would be to write the word "Why?" five-thousand times.  Since then, I've
managed to isolate my befuddlement into coherence.  Hitchcock's Psycho
isn't a perfect film, but it's a good one, and has some genuine scares
and a few interesting characters.  It's only been thirty-eight years
since it came out; it's really not that dated, and is still effective by
many of today's slasher standards.  So why remake it?
I was hoping to get my answer.  I was looking forward to Van Sant's
take on the classic horror tale, mostly to understand why he felt the
need to do it.  But I didn't get my answer.  Van Sant's film is
basically a colorized mirror image of the original.  The dialogue is the
same.  The characters are the same.  The sets and locations are all the
same.  Every single camera angle is exactly the same.  With the
exception of one scene of implied masturbation, and perhaps a little
more blood, Gus Van Sant's Psycho is an exact recreation of Hitchcock's
original film.
So why on God's green earth was there a reason to make this film
*again*?  Well, I read that Van Sant was "paying homage" to Hitchcock. 
I can see it from that perspective.  The new film doesn't reek of
plagiarism as much as it screams, "I'm such a devoted fan!"  Van Sant is
a wonderful director (Good Will Hunting, To Die For, and My Own Private
Idaho are all exceptional films in different ways), and so I took this
remake seriously.  Why would a great director feel the need to remake a
film of another great director?  In addition, the original Psycho had
the element of shock -- in this new version, that aspect is lost
entirely.  As I said, if you don't know what happens to Marion in the
shower, you need to see the original first.
Before you flip out, understand that I don't mean Van Sant should have
tried to improve on Hitchcock's direction.  No, that would have been
silly.  The fact that Van Sant didn't experiment with different
techniques is a good thing.  But this story should have been updated;
the characters don't speak like people from the 90s -- particularly
Norman Bates.  The private investigator (played by a wonderful William
H. Macy) is a fun character, but do private investigators still act like
that?  Something tells me they don't.  There aren't any blatant
anachronisms, but the script hasn't been changed at all.
If anything, seeing this new version reminded me of what was wrong with
the original.  After Marion Crane dies, the focus shifts to two
uninteresting characters -- Marion's boyfriend, Sam (Viggo Mortensen)
and sister, Lila (Julianne Moore).  As they're trying to figure out what
happened to Marion, we're left wondering why they don't just tackle
Norman Bates and search through that big old house on the hill.  Perhaps
when the original came out it was shocking to see the main character die
half way through.  Moore and Mortensen are both adequate for their
roles, but the script just doesn't have much for them to do.
The film isn't bad or unpleasant; Heche and Vaughn both hit their roles
dead-on, and any scene featuring one or both of them is inescapably
entertaining.  In addition, the scenes that everybody will be watching
for -- particularly the dreaded Shower Scene -- have been done with
class; Van Sant, in a wise move, didn't exploit the violence or go
over-the-top with gore.  It's only slightly more graphic than the
original (though the sound effects are a lot harsher in this one).
Just about the only improvement is on the sound quality of the music
(the music, by the way, is excellent).  But I know the point was not to
improve on the original, but "to bring it to a new generation."  I'm not
sure why the New Generation can't go out and rent the original, but it
seems they're going to be disappointed with Psycho anyway.  The New
Generation wants movies like I Still Know What You Did Last Summer;
Psycho -- new or old -- just isn't gory enough for them.  
As for me, I wanted a better reason to sit through a replica of the
original.  Van Sant is a great director, but the one thing about
Hitchcock's Psycho was that it was really shocking.  The only way this
new version could have been shocking would have been to change it.  And,
of course it shouldn't have been changed, and so we enter a vicious
circle that didn't need to be entered in the first place.

Author
Phineas Narco
Review of Psycho (remade 1998 version) by Phineas Narco
     I wonder if Hitchcock has enough room in his coffin, he must be
building up some pretty good RPM's right about now. 
    Well, It's probably an impossible task to review the new Psycho
remake, directed by Gus Van Sant (My Own Private Idaho, Drugstore
Cowboy), without comparing it to the original classic so I won't even
try. 
     The original masterpiece, directed of course by Alfred Hitchcock,
the master of suspense, was the tale of a boy and his mother. The
'boy' of course, being Norman Bates, curator of the Bates motel, an
out of the way little establishment that hardly no one visits anymore.
     One night, he's visited by Marion Crane (here played by Anne
Heche reprising the Janet Leigh role) who is on the run from the law.
One shower later and... well the rest is history, isn't it? Cinematic
history. Why mess with it?
    But then, Psycho has been sequelized, cable-TV prequelized, made
into a short-lived TV series, and now it's been remade. Someone in
Hollywood keeps trying to franchize this movie with some pretty bad
results. What's next, are we going to have a video game and Taco Bell
designer glasses? 
     Frankly  I had my doubts when I heard they were remaking Psycho.
It was like someone remaking the Wizard of Oz or Citizen Kane. How can
you improve on perfection? Indeed for the most part Van Sant seems not
so much to reinterpret the original vision but simply copy it over
shot per shot and line for line. There are some original touches, but
they are hardly worth the price of admission. In fact most of them are
downright awful.
     Keep in mind that in 1960 no one had seen anything quite like
Psycho. It left audiences breathless. Movie-goers were not allowed
into the theater after it started. There were stories of people
fainting and having heart attacks. 
     But what kind of impact is the story of a psychotic little mama's
boy like Norman Bates going to have on the desensitized audiences of
1998 when we've seen Ted Bundy and Jeffrey Dahmer and countless other
serial-killers-of-the-week not to mention hundreds of slasher movies?
     To devotees of the original film, Psycho (the new movie) proceeds
like a recurring dream. But this time around it's as if you had too
much pizza to eat the night before. 
     For one thing the pacing is all wrong. Hitchcock had this way of
allowing these exquisitely-timed pregnant silences between the lines
that were even more important than the lines themselves. He let you
*savor* the anxiety. That is called... 'suspense'. 
     Here, everything is rushed and clipped, as if everyone's had one
too many latte's at Starbucks before going on the set and can hardly
wait to hurry onto the next scene. Perhaps the makers of the film
thought that today's modern audiences cornfed on too much MTV wouldn't
have the attention span to sit through a dramatic pause or two.
     Even the new Norman seems 'on something'. Perhaps those candies
he munches on obsessively are actually No-Doz tablets. Compared to
Anthony Perkins' studied portrayal of a pent-up, nervously withdrawn
and stammering recluse, the 'new' Norman seems positively manic. 
     Flashing wicked smiles and winks as he flirts and mugs, and
throwing off glib one-liners like "You have a wonderful quality about
you that puts guys at ease", he's so cocksure and bristling with
energy, you wonder what he's doing wasting his life in the middle of
nowhere. He should be in Hollywood somewhere pitching horrible movies
like this one. 
     Another major problem with this story is that it doesn't belong
in 1998. I thought 'well maybe they're remaking it because they want
to modernize the tale' after all the ad copy says 'A modern vision of
the original classic'. But since 95% of the script is taken verbatim
from the original script the 'modern vision' seems to consist of
afterthought touches like Lila Crane saying "Wait, let me grab my
walkman" before her and Sam go to see the sheriff. What?? What does
her walkman have to do with anything??
     The dialogue is fraught with embarassing anachronisms. One
example is the used car saleman saying to Marion, "You have a right to
do anything you have a mind to, being a woman, you will". That sort of
line in 1960 might have been flattering, today it sounds like
chauvanistic condescension. The sweating actor who delivers it
actually looks embarassed at the lines coming out of his mouth.
     I should have asked for my money back at the theater, because I
paid to see a horror movie and I got a comedy. I lost track of how
many times the audience laughed, tittered, giggled and openly jeered
at scenes that should have been steeped in suspense and horror. Van
Sant tries to make it shocking enough for today's sensibilities, but
the results are unintentionally humorous. The only time the movie
works is as camp, and sometimes I truly wondered if it was intended
that way. 
     For example, when Norman pulls back the picture to gaze at Marion
undressing through his peephole, Van Sant actually inserts the
whap-whap-whap sound of him masturbating. The audience howled like it
was a scene out of Porky's. I almost walked out at that point, but I
wanted to see what he did with the shower scene. (Answer: it raises an
eyebrow but is hardly worth waiting for). 
    I kept waiting for Van Sant to GO somewhere with the material.
What he was going to do with the story? It would have been interesting
to see the makers of this film truly rework it from the ground up
instead of just adding a few modern technical touches. 
     For instance, instead of Sam living on a cot in the back of a
hardware store, what if he was sleeping on his buddy's couch and
working at a temp job at Manpower? Doesn't that seem to make more
sense in today's world?
     Or why not have Arbogast (the private detective played by William
Macy) be a woman? It would have been interesting to see Kathy Bates
put Norman Bates on the spot, but I guess that would have required too
many rewrites. 
     The plot is also seeded with logic problems when told in a modern
setting:
     For example, why would Sam and Marion have a tryst in a hotel at
the beginning of the movie? In 1960 it would be because they wouldn't
want to start a scandal. Today they would just have sex at her house.
The neighbors wouldn't even notice. Why rent a room?
     Why is Arbogast wearing such a ridiculous hat? So he can look
more like a private detective? Who wears hats anymore? 
     Why in the world would a millionaire throw around $400,000 in
cash in today's world of ATM check cards and internet banking? To
avoid paying taxes, he declares for all the world to hear and casually
hands it to the secretary. What?? Would this EVER happen? The IRS
would be on him like flies on Mrs. Bates' corpse and no reputable bank
would do business that way. Doesn't this little plot point need SOME
kind of rewrite to make it believable nowadays?
     On the bright side however, there is one nice thing that came out
of the movie and that is Danny Elfman's adapted soundtrack of Bernard
Herrman's score. It sounds wonderful. I was just sorry I had to be
watching this movie while listening to it. Indeed the score has been
imitated so much since the 1960's it seems campy in the context of a
modern movie..
    I see the original Hitchcock classic as sort of like Hamlet. This
movie is like a bad junior high school production of it. It's problem
when retold in the modern age is that, like Hamlet, it's wrought with
many since-told 'cliches'. 
     Let's face it, when it comes to movies about psychotic murderers,
today's audiences have seen it all. (How many times have we seen the
shower scene ripped off?). The irony is, those who have never seen the
original Psycho probably don't know that the slasher movie moves
they've seen so many times can be traced back to just the film they're
watching a bastardized version of. The tragedy is, after seeing this
one first, they've rather spoiled their enjoyment of seeing the
original. 
     Please, please, please, if you have not seen the original Psycho
do NOT, I repeat DO NOT watch this one. Save your seven and a half
bucks and go rent the original for a dollar at Blockbuster's. 
     I had hopes for this movie and still think it might have been at
least an interesting remake if completely reworked and reinterpreted
under the hand of a more disturbed director like John McNaughton or
David Lynch. 
    But as it is, I can't help thinking that it would be better to
just let the story be as it is, preserved in time, as a classic, like
one of Norman's stuffed birds.  

Author
Charles Henderson
Charles Henderson's movie reviews -- written from a theological
perspective appear regularly at:
http://christianity.miningco.com
Following up on his huge success with Good Will Hunting, Director Gus
Van Sant has taken a bold risk in making another ground breaking film: a
remake of Alfred Hitchcock's 1960 original, Psycho. There has never been
anything quite like this. For Van Sant uses virtually the same script,
score, and camera angles that made the Hitchcock version of the film a
classic. I saw the film on opening night in New York and wanted to
review it right away. In doing a "background check" to compare what Van
Sant has done here with the Hitchcock template, I've come to see what a
remarkable effort this is. And thanks to the number of websites that
have been created around the 1960 film, you'll be able to see for
yourself exactly what I mean.
But first, a word about Hitchcock's original. It did not open to
critical acclaim. Its status as a classic emerged over time.  It took
over thirty years to achieve such stature that it regularly appears in
college textbooks, television specials, and now on the Internet, as an
object of veneration. There is even one website created for the sole
purpose of stopping this film from being made. A vain effort to be sure.
Still, the culture-icon status of Psycho will make it all the more
difficult for Van Sant.
In discussing his project with members of the Hitchcock family, and the
screen writer, Joseph Stefano, Van Sant described his project not as a
remake, but as a "revival." He wanted to preserve as much of Hitchcock's
vision as possible. And the extent to which he has gone to do this is
exemplified  in the famous shower scene. A frame by frame comparison
between the two versions of the film is possible thanks to one website
where an animation of the original scene has been assembled. The
similarities are striking. And the same is true throughout the film. The
major differences are, of course, the color, and the acting. Many
reviewers will compare the Janet Leigh/Anthony Perkins face-off in stark
black and white with the Anne Heche/Vince Vaughn re-creation in full
color. The actors follow the same plot, read the same lines, even
retrace the same footsteps and body movements, but in so-doing convey
something quite original and unique. Which brings me close to the reason
I was so interested in reviewing this film -- from the point of view of
a person of faith.
There will probably be as steep an uphill climb for me to persuade
devout readers that the Psycho remake has merit as it will be for Van
Sant to convince Hitchcock true believers that anything like a "revival"
of the Master's work would be worthy of the attempt. This is doubly
true, of course, because this movie -- in either version -- has few, if
any, obviously redeeming qualities.  Its focal point is a bloody murder
committed by a mentally deranged young man.  The book on which the
film-script is based was inspired by a true story of a perverted mass
murderer. That this criminal both in real life and in the movies is
"brought to justice," will not be of sufficient significance to offer
Psycho as a "morality play."  At a deeper level, this movie is about the
traps we all find ourselves in, and the difficulty of escaping them.
Neither will this be a sufficient reason for readers of this review
either to rent Psycho, take one, or go out to your local theater to see
Psycho, take two.
What I find most worthy of attention in this whole situation, and this
may be closer to what Van Sant was getting at in his "revival," is the
larger lesson that this film has to teach about both story telling and
"truth telling."  As any story teller knows (including those of us who
merely read stories to our children) there's as much in a story that is
brought to it by the listeners as the tellers, and each time a powerful
story is told, it takes on new meaning. This is true of the good mystery
stories that Alfred Hitchcock told; it is also true of the "greatest
story ever told, " and, for that matter, the entire contents of the Holy
Bible. Biblical literalists notwithstanding, the truthfulness of the
Bible cannot be validated simply by repeating the words of the text over
and over again. The meaning of the text can only be validated within a
living community of faith and within the personal lives of individual
believers. And, equally important, the truths to be found in the Bible
will vary from age to age as its implications are seen and appreciated
by different people in different ways.
The two versions of Psycho, identical though they may be in sharing the
same script, are vastly different in terms of  look and feel.  More
important, the differences in nuance and meaning are striking. Their
animating spirit is profoundly different. The actors, of course, make a
great deal of difference, the colors less so. Most critical is the
unique event that takes place when film and film-maker, actors and
audiences encounter each other in the viewing of the film. Seeing Psycho
in 1998 is different than seeing it in 1960, whatever version you are
seeing.   During the showing of the film that I attended at a theatre in
Manhattan, two individuals in the next row of seats started fighting and
had to be ejected. Rather than disrupting the film, the conflict seemed
to heighten the suspense, drawing further attention to the
"congregation" that would experience this "revival" as none other.  I
suspect that Van Sant's effort will be studied alongside the original,
precisely for what such a parallel viewing will reveal about what has
become of us, as a people, during the near 40 years between these two
films. Seeing Psycho, take one, and Psycho, take two, side-by-side is
like taking a stereoscopic photo that penetrates into the depths of who
we are as a people. Four flames.

Author
Greg King
When it was revealed that Universal studios and Gus Van Sant
were planning to remake Alfred Hitchcock's 1960 classic Psycho the
initial reaction was "Why?"  The only legitimate reasons for remaking
a film are to add something fresh and original to a film that is old
and very dated, or because the technology has enabled directors to
create effects that weren't possible way back when. There is a
precedent for Hollywood remaking films.  Most notably a number of
European comedies and dramas have been remade by Hollywood, ostensibly
bringing art house films to a multiplex crowd.  Recently, Dutch
director George Sluizer remade his The Vanishing for Hollywood, and
John Badham directed The Assassin (aka The Point Of No return), a
slavish shot by shot remake of Luc Besson's tough thriller La Femme
Nikita.  Hitchcock himself has been remade several times, from The 39
Steps, The Lady Vanishes, and Dial M For Murder, to his own remake of
The Man Who Knew Too Much.  Brian De Palma successfully reworked
Vertigo with his thriller Obsession, which perfectly captured
Hitchcock's style.
This workmanlike and unnecessary remake of Psycho seems to
exist for no other reason that to introduce this classic to a whole
new generation of film goers who have never seen the original in a
cinema, or who can't be bothered to sit through a black and white
film.  It is indicative of the bankruptcy of ideas within Hollywood
when a director has to remake a classic film virtually shot for shot.
It is an interesting cinematic exercise, true, but it fails to add
anything fresh or interesting to the film, and Van Sant fails to stamp
his own style upon it.
Original writer Joseph Stefano has been hired to rework his
screenplay, but he adds little to the film.  Psycho is a curiously old
fashioned and dated film, and a number of anachronisms creep into the
action and the dialogue.
Van Sant adds nothing of his personality to the film, and
instead he seems to have replicated Hitchcock's style, right down to
the close-ups and dazzling camera angles, without capturing the uneasy
atmosphere.  He even uses the original Bernard Hermann score to
underscore the tension.  But somehow, even the famed shower scene
doesn't seem quite as frightening here.  Van Sant (Good Will Hunting,
etc) is the wrong director for this project - it probably required
someone who reveres Hitchcock.
The biggest problem with the film lies in the casting of the
central character, the unforgettable Norman Bates.  Anthony Perkins
had the nervous tics, the unnerving edginess, the haunted, gaunt
visage, and the disturbing air that made him seem nuts.  Vince Vaughn
(recently seen playing another psychotic killer in Clay Pigeons) on
the other hand is far too butch and masculine, and hardly seems
convincing.
Anne Heche is fine as Marion Crane, the embezzler who checks
into Bates' motel, for a night, and finds more than she bargained for.
The supporting cast is fleshed out with solid performances from
William H Macy in the Martin Balsam role as the private investigator,
Julianne Moore as Marion's sister, and Robert Forster (from Jackie
Brown, etc) as the psychiatrist.
 
The cinematography from Chris Doyle, the Sydney born
photographer who is a favourite of Wong Kar-wai, often appears
suitably washed out and drained, giving the film an aged look.
However, Universal could have saved themselves a lot of money and
critical anguish by re-releasing the original Psycho in a brand new,
restored, pristine print.  No matter what happens with this remake,
this film will always be remembered as Hitchcock's Psycho, not Van
Sant's.  Aye, and there's the rub!

Author
Michael Redman
Of all the questions that have puzzled mankind over the years, "Why?" is the
most difficult to answer. Philosophers struggle with the Why of human
existence. For journalists the rest of the big "W"s are simple compared to
that one.
Newspaper articles ask "Why did Bill Clinton act like a 16-year old kid in
heat instead of being a little more careful?" Your young daughter questions
"Why did God let my kitten die?" Your lover wants to know "Why do you have to
be the way you are?"
In many situations there are no real answers or at least none that we can ever
know. Van Morrison's studied response is "It ain't why, why, why, why, why. It
just is." When asked why he chose to redo "Psycho", director Gus Van Sant
paraphrases the great philosophical jeans commercial: "Why ask why?"
He also explains that he'd like to bring the great Hitchcock film to a new
generation of audiences that have never seen it. He wants to introduce color
to the classic. None of these reasons wash.
Re-issuing the original on the big screen would allow new viewers to see the
film...it seems to have worked for The Wizard Of Oz. If the first
version had been destroyed, this might make more sense, but it's still around
and it's still a great film. Color would be a good excuse if it added anything
to the movie. It doesn't.
"Psycho" is one of those films that have become a part of modern western
mythology. Nearly everyone knows the story. When someone stabs the air with a
clinched fist accompanied by screeching noises, you get the reference. Years
ago, explaining a trip to Madison, Wisconsin, I mentioned to friends that I'd
spent a night in the Bates Motel. They all understood.
In case there's anyone who isn't familiar with the plot, here's the "Reader's
Digest" version. Marion Crane (Anne Heche) steals a ton of money from her
boss. Making a poor choice in lodging, she checks into a motel run by Norman
Bates (Vince Vaughn) who has a very odd relationship with his mother. After
she disappears, her boyfriend and sister come looking for her.
Touted as a shot-by-shot recreation of the original, it's really not. Camera
angles are different. The script has been slightly re-written by original
screenwriter Joseph Stefano. Although Van Sant has done a credible job of
maintaining Hitchcock's scenes, he loses the spirit. The film is lifeless.
There are two primary audiences for this film. Those that have seen the
original and want to compare the two and those that have never viewed the
first one and are seeing the story for the first time. It doesn't work very
well for either.
Even for teenagers who haven't experienced the 1960's version, most know about
the shower scene and Norman's mom. These work most effectively as surprises.
After untold slasher films, the killings here aren't as terrifying as they
were 40 years ago.
The story hasn't been updated enough to provide much entertainment for people
who want a new version. The few new items don't add much. Norman indulges in a
very personal activity while watching Marion disrobe through his peep hole.
The shower scene is a bit more revealing. There are a few lines of dialog that
Hitchcock wanted and weren't in the original but they're minimal.
Some scenes don't make sense. A couple extremely short hallucinations occur
during a killing. So brief that they are difficult to catch -- maybe a
semi-clad woman on a couch, some animal in a fog perhaps on train tracks --
they feel tossed in for no reason.
The bizarre combination of the sixties and nineties is distracting. Private
detective Milton Arbogast (William H. Macy) is well-played but his dialog is
anachronistic and his suit and hat are out of some time that films have never
seen. Computers sit on a desk in an office that could have been designed in
1950. Lila (Julianne Moore), Marion's sister mentions that she has to get her
Walkman, prompting a laugh from the audience only because it is so out of place.
All of this would be minor if the film worked. But it mostly doesn't.
Everything is flat. The original shower was extraordinary. The editing in the
newer version isn't as effective and now it's just one more murder scene. 
Heche does a good job of portraying the conflicted Marion, but she often comes
across as searching for her character. Vaughn is never menacing. Viggo
Mortensen as Marion's lover occasionally appears to have taken lessons from
the Dick Tracy villain Mumbles. Moore is one exception, playing Lila as a
lively hard-edged modern woman.
I got the feeling that most of the audience was watching the movie while
replaying the original in their minds. It is almost impossible to do
otherwise. Watching for similarities and differences is fun for a while, but
it doesn't carry the entire film. After that limited entertainment value wears
off, you're just marking time until the end. If you have any doubts as to the
popularity of the Compare The Films game, try to rent a copy of the original.
Good luck finding one in stock.
The film is an academic exercise. It's like a beginning painting assignment:
re-paint Van Gogh's sunflowers brush stroke by brush stroke, but this time
make them blue. I'm sure that Van Sant learned a lot about Hitchcock during
his experience, but that doesn't make it any more interesting for the rest of us.
The film reminds me of Shakespeare's answer as to the "why" of life: "...full
of sound and fury, signifying nothing."
(Michael Redman has written this column for well over 23 years and he's
working on a painting of Mona Lisa but without the smile. Email your
suggestions of classics that need redone to Redman@indepen.com.)
[This appeared in the 12/10/98 "Bloomington Independent", Bloomington,
Indiana. Michael Redman can be contacted at Redman@indepen.com]
-- 
mailto:redman@indepen.com
This week's film review at http://www.indepen.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Author
James Sanford
 For most directors, the purpose of doing a remake of someone's film is to
explore undeveloped themes in the original or to put fresh twists on old
material. When Nancy Meyers and Charles Shyer created their successful
recent version of "The Parent Trap," for example, they basically revamped
the humor of the 1961 Hayley Mills vehicle while preserving the storyline;
director Ron Underwood's upcoming rewrite of the giant-ape fantasy "Mighty
Joe Young" will address the issue of poachers hunting endangered species, a
topic unheard of when "Joe" came out in 1949.
 Director Gus Van Sant's modernization of Alfred Hitchcock's 1960 "Psycho,"
however, is an oddball exception to the rule, a movie so slavishly faithful
to its source that finally the audience begins to wonder what the point of
the picture is.
 Universal Pictures refused to screen this "Psycho" for critics last week,
arguing that Hitchcock never previewed his movie before its opening. But
Hitchcock had a good reason, since in 1960 no one knew about the
bait-and-switch structure of "Psycho," how the story begins as a tale of
embezzlement and paranoia and suddenly becomes a shocker about the gruesome
consequences of Oedipal obsession.
 Thirty-eight years later, even those who never saw the original know the
basics of the story, and sitting through this "Psycho" is like watching a
team of Kinkos employees assembling the world's most lavish Xerox job.
Initially there's a certain wonder to seeing Anne Heche follow in Janet
Leigh's footsteps as the doomed Marion Crane and hearing Bernard Herrmann's
nerve-shredding score in digital stereo.
 But although Van Sant has obviously worked overtime to get the basic
imagery right -- the movie's look is a cunning blend of early 1960s artifice
and 1990s attitude -- he has utterly failed in his mission to recreate the
gripping atmosphere that hung over virtually every frame of Hitchcock's
film. This is a thriller that never generates a single jolt of terror.
 In fact, almost immediately after Van Sant's careful recreation of the
infamous shower scene -- presented here with slightly more blood and much
more nudity than would ever have been allowed in 1960 -- "Psycho" becomes
one thing Hitchcock's movie never was: deadly dull.
 Van Sant's deviations from the model are cosmetic and mostly silly. Now
when demented motel manager Norman Bates (Vince Vaughn) spies on Marion
while she strips, we hear him unzip his pants, drop his trousers and breathe
heavily. Thanks, Gus, we needed that.
 Similiarly dopey is the insertion of storm clouds and a shot of what looks
like a cow standing in the middle of a foggy road during the scene in which
snooping private eye Arbogast (William H. Macy, slouching around amusingly
in a suit that looks older than its wearer) runs afoul of Mother Bates. The
only major characterization change involves Julianne Moore's portrayal of
Marion's sister Lila as a strident man-hater rather than the sweet
wallflower Vera Miles created. It's not exactly a misstep, but it doesn't
add anything to the story either.
 Plotwise, "Psycho" follows the first film as if the script had been
chieseled on tablets of stone. The biggest difference is that in 1960
audiences were shocked to discover the willowy, quietly neurotic Norman
Anthony Perkins gave us could have been capable of such savage violence.
Here, the beefier Vaughn looks like something out of a dark alley right from
the start, which removes any doubt about who's responsible for the mayhem
and murder.
 When director Jim McBride transplanted Jean-Luc Godard's New Wave classic
"Breathless" to Los Angeles as the basis for a flashy-trashy 1983 Richard
Gere vehicle, reviewers howled about what a travesty it was. But better to
be daring than to be overly reverent. Like the stuffed birds Norman Bates
collects, Van Sant's "Psycho" is merely a lifeless shell of what was once
wild and thrilling to watch.

Author
Fontaine Lien
        "Psycho" is cinematic storytelling at its best.  Suspenseful, scary,
and yet not over-the-top, it's what so many have strived to achieve and
yet faltered at.  With an unpredictable plot, unconventional
cinematography, a score that enhances and not interrupts, this just might
be the best movie of the year.    
        It's extremely hard to critique a film based *frame-by-frame* on a
classic.  The most one can do is judge the actresses, the actors, the
colors, the *subtlely* reorchestrated music.  But so what if all of these
are up to par, or even brilliantly done?  It's not a remake, it's a
multicolored and expensive duplicate.  At first I was afraid they'd meddle
with the script and destroy a classic; now I wish they'd at last gone and
done *that*.  At least then they'd get credit for being creative.  Now I
wonder why I paid money to go in the theater to watch a mildly
entertaining imitation rather than stayed at home and watched "Vertigo,"
or something.  I do not in any way claim to be a Hitchcock and/or "Psycho"
expert.  The only Hitchcock film I've seen *is* "Psycho," and that was two
years ago.  Anything else I know about Hitchcock I learned from "homages." 
However superficial my understanding of the original may be, I do know
that nothing much has changed except the actors.  Even the sets, the cars,
and the clothing seem to be stuck in the 1950s (except maybe Julianne
Moore's walkman).  
        I don't know if it was the black-and-white or the fact that I had
never seen the movie before, the first time I saw this movie it was much
more exciting.  Norman Bates's world seemed darker, drearier, gloomier. 
You could literally smell the "damp sheets" that he was describing.  Here,
Vince Vaughn's Norman Bates is well-acted, but he lacks the "look"
Anthony Perkins had.  Instead, this Bates is a little to amiable, too cute.
The same goes for Anne Heche (as Marion Crane), who puts up a good fight
but fails a just a little short of the duplicity, the fright, and the
helplessness Janet Leigh conveyed.  The shower scene would have been
more terrifying, given the bright red against stark white background and
more explicit shots, had we not experienced it before.  In short, the movie
was well done, but throughout the movie I couldn't help but ask Why and
What induced the producers to make an exact same movie.  I couldn't see
the point.  While those that haven't seen the original might find this movie
entertaining, the majority of us who *have* seen it fail to see purpose. 
When the initial thrill of seeing and hearing "Psycho" in full 90's
cinematic glory had worn off, the rest of the film became a parade of
dejavu that invoked a chuckle or two at some places, recognition and a
little fright at some others.  Gus Van Sant, a most admired director of
mine, is less of a director than script supervisor in this production.  Well,
at least they saved the screenwriter's salary.  
* The dates in the beginning are exactly the same as they were in the
original.  I think it's rather coincidental that this year, December the 11th
falls on, yes, a Friday.  

Author
Alex Sandell
This review originally appeared at "The Juicy Cerebellum"
(www.juicycerebellum.com) and is copyright 1998 Alex Sandell/Juicy
Cerebellum [All Rights Reserved].
As a lot of you who have been reading this page for a while know, I
consider the original "Psycho" to be the best horror film ever made.
Millions of other people share that opinion with me. This creates some
mighty big shoes for a remake to fill. Some would say, "why even try?"
Universal would answer with, "$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$".
When you are remaking a film classic this legendary, the safest play
would be to make it as close to the original as possible. This is the
play the overrated Gus Van Sant (Good Will Hunting) chose to go with.
Most of this film is a shot-by-shot remaking of the original. It's
actually less of a remake and more of a retread. This will have a lot
of people asking, "what the hell is the point?"
Universal will answer with, "$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$$".
There are a few mindless additions to the film (maybe a total of 3
minutes worth. All 3 minutes will be unnoticeable unless you've seen
the original at least 30 times.) which are put there to try and keep
diehard fans on their toes for two hours. A couple lines of dialogue
have been altered in a failed attempt to bring the 1960 "Psycho"
"up-to-date" with the nineties. And, most annoyingly, whenever a
killing occurs we get some sort of MTV, "Beavis and Butthead on Acid"
sort of directing style where images flash in front of our face
in-between each slice of the knife. 
Wow . . . I wonder if this guy ever saw "Natural Born Killers" before?
Sadly, the film-cloning ends with the actors. The new cast just cannot
live up to the one Hitch assembled back in 1960. Anne Heche does okay
as Marion Crane, but her performance can't compare to Janet Leigh's.
Julianne Moore, an exceptional actress in past roles, just does not
seem to fit the part of Lila Crane. The "nineties" addition of
headphones blaring out rock 'n' roll definitely didn't help any. Viggo
Mortensen is absolutely unbearable as a redneck version of Sam Loomis,
a character portrayed wonderfully in the original by John Gavin.
Finally, although he gives it his best shot by over-acting and
mimicking moves which were perfected by Anthony Perkins, Vince Vaughn
comes off as nothing more than a weasly pest while playing the
infamous Norman Bates. His character doesn't even seem real, and
actually takes away from Mr. Perkin's exceptional performance. It's
almost as though Vaughn climbed inside Perkin's portrayal and beat it
into a whiney, fragmented parody.
This film is ridiculous. A waste of celluloid. I have never seen
anything so abhorrent come out of Hollywood. This is an insult to the
writers, producers, and more than anything, the director (Alfred
Hitchcock, of course) of the original "Psycho". It isn't played as a
tribute, being that the film fails to mention Mr. Hitchcock, or any
other members of the original cast and crew. It isn't played for
humor, such as "The Brady Bunch Movie" was. It seems like nothing more
than a gigantic rip-off meant to suck our wallets dry. Almost as if
Mr. Van Sant decided that if he waited long enough, no one would
notice. Why settle for being considered the "next" Hitchcock, when you
can simply be Hitchcock?
Go rent the original. Stay away from this scam. There's a unique movie
somewhere that wants your attention, instead.
